Florida, session 2026, SB2502.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 620 621 Section 1.âIt is the intent of the Legislature that the 622 implementing and administering provisions of this act apply to 623 the General Appropriations Act for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. 624 Section 2.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 5, 625 6, 88, and 89 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the 626 calculations of the Florida Education Finance Program for the 627 2026-2027 fiscal year included in the document titled âPublic 628 School Funding: The Florida Education Finance Program (FEFP) 629 Fiscal Year 2026-2027,â dated February 13, 2026, and filed with 630 the Secretary of the Senate, are incorporated by reference for 631 the purpose of displaying the calculations used by the 632 Legislature, consistent with the requirements of state law, in 633 making appropriations for the Florida Education Finance Program. 634 This section expires July 1, 2027. 635 Section 3.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 80 636 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the school 637 readiness reimbursement rates for the 2026-2027 fiscal year 638 included in the document titled âSchool Readiness Program 639 Reimbursement Rates Fiscal Year 2026-2027,â dated February 13, 640 2026, and filed with the Secretary of the Senate, are 641 incorporated by reference, consistent with the requirements of 642 state law, in making appropriations for the school readiness 643 program allocation. This section expires July 1, 2027. 644 Section 4.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 102 645 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsections (1), 646 (2), and (5) of section 1001.451, Florida Statutes, are amended 647 to read: 648 1001.451âRegional consortium service organizations.âIn 649 order to provide a full range of programs to larger numbers of 650 students, minimize duplication of services, and encourage the 651 development of new programs and services: 652 (1)âSchool districts with 20,000 or fewer unweighted full 653 time equivalent students, developmental research (laboratory) 654 schools established pursuant to s. 1002.32, and the Florida 655 School for the Deaf and the Blind may enter into cooperative 656 agreements to form a regional consortium service organization. 657 Each regional consortium service organization shall provide any, 658 at a minimum, three of the following services determined 659 necessary and appropriate by the board of directors: 660 (a)âExceptional student education; 661 (b)âSafe schools support teacher education centers; 662 environmental education; 663 (c)âState and federal grant procurement and coordination; 664 (d)âData services processing; health 665 (e)âInsurance services; 666 (f)âRisk management insurance; 667 (g)âProfessional learning; 668 (h)âCollege, career, and workforce development; 669 (i)âBusiness and operational services staff development; 670 (j)âPurchasing; or 671 (k)âPlanning and accountability. 672 (2)(a)âEach regional consortium service organization 673 composed that consists of four or more school districts is 674 eligible to receive, through the Department of Education, 675 subject to the funds provided in the General Appropriations Act, 676 an allocation incentive grant of $150,000 $50,000 per school 677 district and eligible member to be used for the delivery of 678 services within the participating school districts. The 679 determination of services and use of such funds must shall be 680 established by the board of directors of the regional consortium 681 service organization. The funds must shall be distributed to 682 each regional consortium service organization no later than 30 683 days following the release of the funds to the department. Each 684 regional consortium service organization shall submit an annual 685 report to the department regarding the use of funds for 686 consortia services. Unexpended amounts in any fund in a 687 consortiumâs current year operating budget must be carried 688 forward and included as the balance forward for that fund in the 689 approved operating budget for the following year. Each regional 690 consortium service organization shall provide quarterly 691 financial reports to member districts. 692 (b)âMember districts shall designate a district to serve as 693 a fiscal agent for contractual and reporting purposes. Such 694 fiscal agent district is entitled to reasonable compensation for 695 accounting and other services performed. The regional consortium 696 service organization shall retain all funds received from grants 697 or contracted services to cover indirect or administrative costs 698 associated with the provision of such services. The regional 699 consortium service organization board of directors shall 700 determine the products and services to be provided by the 701 consortium; however, in all contractual matters, the school 702 board of the fiscal agent district shall act on proposed actions 703 of the regional consortium service organization. 704 (c)âThe regional consortium service organization board of 705 directors shall recommend establishment of positions and 706 individuals for appointment to the fiscal agent district. 707 Personnel must be employed under the personnel policies of the 708 fiscal agent district and are deemed to be public employees of 709 the fiscal agent district. The regional consortium service 710 organization board of directors may recommend a salary schedule 711 and job descriptions specific to its personnel. 712 (d)âThe regional consortium service organization may 713 purchase or lease property and facilities essential for its 714 operations and is responsible for their maintenance and 715 associated overhead costs. 716 (e)âIf a regional consortium service organization is 717 dissolved, any revenue from the sale of assets must be 718 distributed among the member districts as determined by the 719 board of directors Application for incentive grants shall be 720 made to the Commissioner of Education by July 30 of each year 721 for distribution to qualifying regional consortium service 722 organizations by January 1 of the fiscal year. 723 (5)âThe board of directors of a regional consortium service 724 organization may use various means to generate revenue in 725 support of its activities, including, but not limited to, 726 contracting for services to nonmember districts. The board of 727 directors may acquire, enjoy, use, and dispose of patents, 728 copyrights, and trademarks and any licenses and associated other 729 rights or interests thereunder or therein. Ownership of all such 730 patents, copyrights, trademarks, licenses, and associated rights 731 or interests thereunder or therein shall vest in the state, with 732 the board of directors having full right of use and full right 733 to retain associated the revenues derived therefrom. Any funds 734 realized from contracted services, patents, copyrights, 735 trademarks, or licenses are shall be considered internal funds 736 as provided in s. 1011.07. A fund balance must be established 737 for maintaining or expanding services, facilities maintenance, 738 terminal pay, and other liabilities Such funds shall be used to 739 support the organizationâs marketing and research and 740 development activities in order to improve and increase services 741 to its member districts. 742 Section 5.âThe amendments to s. 1001.451, Florida Statutes, 743 made by this act expire July 1, 2027, and the text of that 744 section shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2026, 745 except that any amendments to such text enacted other than by 746 this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the 747 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions 748 of text which expire pursuant to this section. 749 Section 6.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 102 750 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, section 1001.4511, 751 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 752 1001.4511âRegional Consortia Service Organization 753 Supplemental Services Program.â 754 (1)âThere is created the Regional Consortia Service 755 Organization Supplemental Services Program to increase the 756 ability of regional consortium service organizations under s. 757 1001.451 to provide programs and services to consortia members 758 through cooperative agreements. Program funds may be used to 759 supplement member needs related to transportation; district 760 finance personnel services; property insurance, including 761 property insurance obtained from any source; cybersecurity 762 support; school safety; college, career, and workforce 763 development; academic support; and behavior support within 764 exceptional student education services. 765 (2)âEach regional consortium service organization shall 766 annually report to the President of the Senate and the Speaker 767 of the House of Representatives the distribution of funds, 768 including members awarded and services provided. 769 (3)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351, 770 funds allocated for this purpose which are not disbursed by June 771 30 of the fiscal year in which the funds are allocated may be 772 carried forward for up to 5 years after the effective date of 773 the original appropriation. 774 (4)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 775 Section 7.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 64A 776 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, section 1009.635, 777 Florida Statutes, is created to read: 778 1009.635âRural Incentive for Professional Educators 779 Program.â 780 (1)âESTABLISHMENT.âThe Rural Incentive for Professional 781 Educators (RIPE) Program is established within the Department of 782 Education to support the recruitment and retention of qualified 783 instructional personnel in rural communities. The program shall 784 provide financial assistance for the repayment of student loans 785 for eligible participants who establish permanent residency and 786 employment in rural areas of opportunity. 787 (2)âELIGIBILITY.âAn individual is eligible to participate 788 in the RIPE Program if he or she does all of the following: 789 (a)âEstablishes permanent residency on or after July 1, 790 2026, in a rural area of opportunity as designated pursuant to 791 s. 288.0656. The address on an individualâs state-issued 792 identification card or driver license is evidence of residence. 793 (b)âSecures full-time employment as a teacher or 794 administrator in a private school as defined in s. 1002.01, or 795 as instructional or administrative personnel as those terms are 796 defined in s. 1012.01(2) and (3), respectively, in the public 797 school district located within the same rural area of 798 opportunity as he or she resides. 799 (c)âHolds an associate degree, bachelorâs degree, 800 postgraduate degree, or certificate from an accredited 801 institution earned before establishing residency. 802 (d)âHas an active student loan balance incurred for the 803 completion of the qualifying degree or certificate. 804 (3)âLOAN REPAYMENT.âEligible participants may receive up to 805 $15,000 in total student loan repayment assistance over 5 years, 806 disbursed in annual payments not to exceed $3,000 per year. 807 Payments must be made directly to the lender servicing the 808 participantâs student loan. 809 (4)âAWARD DISTRIBUTION.âBefore disbursement of an award, 810 the department shall verify that the participant: 811 (a)âHas maintained continuous employment with the school 812 district in an instructional or administrative position; 813 (b)âHas received a rating of effective or highly effective 814 pursuant to s. 1012.34; and 815 (c)âHas not been placed on probation, had his or her 816 certificate suspended or revoked, or been placed on the 817 disqualification list, pursuant to s. 1012.796. 818 (5)âADMINISTRATION.âThe program shall be administered by 819 the Office of Student Financial Assistance within the Department 820 of Education, which shall: 821 (a)âDevelop application procedures requiring documentation, 822 including proof of residency, verification of employment, 823 official academic transcripts, and details of outstanding 824 student loans; and 825 (b)âMonitor compliance with program requirements. 826 (6)âRULEMAKING.âThe State Board of Education shall adopt 827 rules no later than January 31, 2027, to administer this 828 section. 829 (7)âEXPIRATION.âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 830 Section 8.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 17 831 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, a state university 832 board of trustees that is beginning an approved capital outlay 833 project with a health care provider may accept the health care 834 providerâs procurement methods and construction contracts 835 entered thereunder and may reimburse the health care provider 836 for its expenses using the proceeds from a bond issuance 837 approved by the Board of Governors. This section expires July 1, 838 2027. 839 Section 9.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 152 840 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding 841 ss. 1011.45 and 1012.975, Florida Statutes, the Florida 842 Agricultural and Mechanical University board of trustees may 843 expend available reserves or carry forward balances from 844 previous yearsâ operational and programmatic appropriations, or 845 other available reserves or balances from funds not appropriated 846 from the General Revenue Fund, from state trust funds, or from 847 tuition and fees, for the remuneration of the president of the 848 Florida Agricultural and Mechanical University. This section 849 expires July 1, 2027. 850 Section 10.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 851 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 852 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 853 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 854 amendment, subject to the notice, review, and objection 855 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to realign funding 856 within the Medicaid program appropriation categories to address 857 projected surpluses and deficits within the program and to 858 maximize the use of state trust funds. A single budget amendment 859 shall be submitted in the last quarter of the 2026-2027 fiscal 860 year only. This section expires July 1, 2027. 861 Section 11.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 862 190 through 195 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 863 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 864 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 865 amendment, subject to the notice, review, and objection 866 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to realign funding 867 within the Florida Kidcare program appropriation categories, or 868 to increase budget authority in the Childrenâs Medical Services 869 network category, to address projected surpluses and deficits 870 within the program or to maximize the use of state trust funds. 871 A single budget amendment must be submitted in the last quarter 872 of the 2026-2027 fiscal year only. This section expires July 1, 873 2027. 874 Section 12.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 875 490 through 499 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 876 subsection (17) of section 381.986, Florida Statutes, is amended 877 to read: 878 381.986âMedical use of marijuana.â 879 (17)âRules adopted pursuant to this section before July 1, 880 2027 2026, are not subject to ss. 120.54(3)(b) and 120.541. This 881 subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026. 882 Section 13.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 883 217, 219, and 223 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 884 the Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 885 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting 886 additional spending authority to implement the federally 887 approved directed payment program for hospitals statewide 888 providing inpatient and outpatient services to Medicaid managed 889 care enrollees, the Indirect Medical Education (IME) Program, 890 and a nursing workforce expansion and education program for 891 certain institutions participating in a graduate medical 892 education or nursing education program. For institutions 893 participating in the nursing workforce expansion and education 894 program, the budget amendment must identify the educational 895 institutions partnering with the teaching hospital. Institutions 896 participating in the nursing workforce expansion and education 897 program shall provide quarterly reports to the agency detailing 898 the number of nurses participating in the program. This section 899 expires July 1, 2027. 900 Section 14.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 901 217, 219, and 223 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 902 the Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 903 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting 904 additional spending authority to implement the federally 905 approved Directed Payment Program and fee-for-service 906 supplemental payments for cancer hospitals that meet the 907 criteria in 42 U.S.C. s. 1395ww(d)(1)(B)(v). This section 908 expires July 1, 2027. 909 Section 15.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 910 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the 911 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 912 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting 913 additional spending authority to implement the Low Income Pool 914 component of the Florida Managed Medical Assistance 915 Demonstration up to the total computable funds authorized by the 916 federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. The budget 917 amendment must include the final terms and conditions of the Low 918 Income Pool, a proposed distribution model by entity, and a 919 listing of entities contributing intergovernmental transfers to 920 support the state match required. In addition, for each entity 921 included in the distribution model, a signed attestation must be 922 provided which includes the charity care cost upon which the Low 923 Income Pool payment is based and an acknowledgment that should 924 the distribution result in an overpayment based on the Low 925 Income Pool cost limit audit, the entity is responsible for 926 returning that overpayment to the agency for return to the 927 federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. This section 928 expires July 1, 2027. 929 Section 16.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 930 222 and 223 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the 931 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 932 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting 933 additional spending authority to implement fee-for-service 934 supplemental payments and a directed payment program for 935 physicians and subordinate licensed health care practitioners 936 employed by or under contract with a Florida medical or dental 937 school, or a public hospital. This section expires July 1, 2027. 938 Section 17.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 939 220, 223, and 235 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 940 the Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 941 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting 942 additional spending authority to implement a certified 943 expenditure program for emergency medical transportation 944 services. This section expires July 1, 2027. 945 Section 18.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 946 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 947 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 948 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 949 amendment, subject to the notice, review, and objection 950 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, requesting 951 additional spending authority to implement the Disproportionate 952 Share Hospital Program. The budget amendment must include a 953 proposed distribution model by entity and a listing of entities 954 contributing intergovernmental transfers and certified public 955 expenditures to support the state match required. This section 956 expires July 1, 2027. 957 Section 19.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 958 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the 959 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit a budget 960 amendment pursuant to chapter 216, Florida Statutes, requesting 961 additional spending authority to implement fee-for-service 962 inpatient and outpatient supplemental payments for specialty 963 hospitals as defined in s. 395.002(28), Florida Statutes, 964 providing comprehensive acute care services to children with 965 Medicaid inpatient utilization equal to or greater than 50 966 percent and located in a county with greater than 250,000 967 Medicaid enrollees in 2023. This section expires July 1, 2027. 968 Section 20.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 969 201 and 228 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 970 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 971 Agency for Health Care Administration may submit budget 972 amendments, subject to the notice, review, and objection 973 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget 974 authority to support the Florida School-Based Services program. 975 This section expires July 1, 2027. 976 Section 21.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 977 209 through 237 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act: 978 (1) the Applied Behavior Analysis (ABA) Task Force, a task 979 force as defined in s. 20.03(5), Florida Statutes, is created 980 within the Agency for Health Care Administration to evaluate the 981 delivery of applied behavior analysis services in a manner that 982 promotes high-quality, family-centered care while ensuring long 983 term financial sustainability of the Medicaid program and cost 984 predictability without disrupting access for current enrollees 985 and families. 986 (2)âThe task force shall evaluate: 987 (a)âClinical care models that lead to best practices for 988 the provision of therapy at the appropriate ages; 989 (b)âAppropriate transitions for enrollees receiving ABA 990 services across developmental, educational, and community 991 settings; 992 (c)âQuality metrics for ABA therapy services; 993 (d)âLimits and utilization controls related to the length 994 of time ABA services may be authorized; 995 (e)âPotential caps on the number of months an enrollee may 996 receive ABA services; and 997 (f)âWays to enhance Medicaid provider enrollment and 998 billing standards for ABA services to promote program integrity 999 and fiscal accountability. 1000 (3)âThe task force shall develop recommendations for 1001 revising the stateâs service delivery model to improve care 1002 experience and service continuity for enrollees and families 1003 receiving ABA services, while safeguarding long-term program 1004 sustainability. 1005 (4)âThe task force shall consist of 10 members as provided 1006 in this subsection. 1007 (a)âThe Secretary of Health Care Administration, or his or 1008 her designee, shall serve as an ex officio, nonvoting member of 1009 the task force and shall serve as the chair. 1010 (b)âThe remainder of the task force membership shall be 1011 composed as follows: 1012 1.âTwo members appointed by the Governor, three members 1013 appointed by the President of the Senate, and three members 1014 appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, based 1015 upon the criteria of this subparagraph. The appointing officers 1016 must make their appointments prioritizing members who have the 1017 following experience or expertise: 1018 a.âPersons with academic credentials or scientific 1019 expertise relating to autism and applied behavior analysis; 1020 b.âRepresentatives of the applied behavior analysis 1021 provider community; 1022 c.âRepresentatives of Medicaid managed care plans with 1023 managerial experience and expertise relating to autism and 1024 applied behavior analysis; or 1025 d.âPhysicians licensed under chapter 458, Florida Statutes, 1026 or chapter 459, Florida Statutes, with expertise relating to 1027 autism and applied behavior analysis. 1028 2.âOne family member of a Medicaid managed care plan 1029 enrollee who receives applied behavior analysis services, 1030 appointed by the Governor. 1031 (c)âThe Secretary of Health Care Administration shall 1032 coordinate with the appointing officers to ensure the task 1033 forceâs membership adequately represents the criteria provided 1034 under paragraph (b). 1035 (d)âAny vacancy occurring on the task force must be filled 1036 in the same manner as the original appointment. 1037 (5)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration must provide 1038 staff support for the work of the task force, and staff from the 1039 Department of Health, the Department of Children and Families, 1040 the Department of Education, and the Agency for Persons with 1041 Disabilities may provide additional expertise. 1042 (6)âMeetings of the task force may be held through 1043 teleconference or other electronic means. The task force shall 1044 convene for its initial meeting by August 15, 2026, and 1045 thereafter, upon the call of the chair. Notices for any task 1046 force meetings must be published in advance on the Agency for 1047 Health Care Administrationâs website. 1048 (7)âMembers of the task force shall serve without 1049 compensation but shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as 1050 provided in s. 112.061, Florida Statutes. 1051 (8)âThe task force shall report its findings and 1052 recommendations to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 1053 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by December 31, 1054 2026. The report must include advantages and disadvantages of 1055 each recommendation. 1056 (9)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 1057 Section 22.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1058 339, 339B, 368 through 369 of the 2026-2027 General 1059 Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, 1060 Florida Statutes, the Department of Children and Families may 1061 submit a budget amendment, subject to the notice, review, and 1062 objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to realign 1063 funding within the department based on the implementation of the 1064 Guardianship Assistance Program, between the specific 1065 appropriations for guardianship assistance payments, foster care 1066 Level 1 room and board payments, relative caregiver payments, 1067 and nonrelative caregiver payments. This section expires July 1, 1068 2027. 1069 Section 23.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1070 209 through 212, 217, 219, 220, 222 through 224, 363, 372, 475, 1071 479, 480, 486, 501, 502, 508, and 512 of the 2026-2027 General 1072 Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, 1073 Florida Statutes, the Department of Children and Families, the 1074 Department of Health, and the Agency for Health Care 1075 Administration may submit budget amendments, subject to the 1076 notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida 1077 Statutes, to increase budget authority to support refugee 1078 programs administered by the federal Office of Refugee 1079 Resettlement due to the ongoing instability of federal 1080 immigration policy and the resulting inability of the state to 1081 reasonably predict, with certainty, the budgetary needs of this 1082 state with respect to the number of refugees relocated to the 1083 state as part of those federal programs. The Department of 1084 Children and Families shall submit quarterly reports to the 1085 Executive Office of the Governor, the President of the Senate, 1086 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives on the number of 1087 refugees entering the state, the nations of origin of such 1088 refugees, and current expenditure projections. This section 1089 expires July 1, 2027. 1090 Section 24.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1091 295 through 390A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 1092 and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, 1093 the Department of Children and Families may submit budget 1094 amendments, subject to the notice, review, and objection 1095 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget 1096 authority to support the following federal grant programs: the 1097 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Grant Program, the Pandemic 1098 Electronic Benefit Transfer, the American Rescue Plan Grant, the 1099 State Opioid Response Grant, the Substance Use Prevention and 1100 Treatment Block Grant, the Chafee Grant for Independent Living 1101 Services, the Education and Traditional Voucher Grant, Title IV 1102 B Subparts 1 and 2 Grants, the Elder Justice Act, the STOP 1103 Violence Against Women Grant, the Rapid Unsheltered Survivor 1104 Housing Grant, and the Mental Health Block Grant. This section 1105 expires July 1, 2027. 1106 Section 25.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 1107 267 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 1108 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 32 of chapter 1109 2025-199, Laws of Florida, subsection (2) of section 393.066, 1110 Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1111 393.066âCommunity services and treatment.â 1112 (2)âNecessary services shall be purchased, rather than 1113 provided directly by the agency, when the purchase of services 1114 is more cost-efficient than providing them directly. All 1115 purchased services must be approved by the agency. As a 1116 condition of payment and before billing, persons or entities 1117 under contract with the agency to provide services shall use 1118 agency data management systems to document service provision to 1119 clients or shall maintain such information in its own data 1120 management system and electronically transmit it to the agency 1121 data management system in an industry standard electronic format 1122 designated by the agency. The agency may not require training on 1123 the use of agency data management systems by persons or entities 1124 that choose to maintain data in their own data management 1125 system, provided that they electronically transmit required 1126 information in a format and frequency designated by the agency. 1127 Contracted persons and entities shall meet the minimum hardware 1128 and software technical requirements established by the agency 1129 for the use of such systems. Such persons or entities shall also 1130 meet any requirements established by the agency for training and 1131 professional development of staff providing direct services to 1132 clients. 1133 Section 26.âThe text of s. 393.066(2), Florida Statutes, as 1134 carried forward from chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, by this 1135 act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that subsection shall 1136 revert to that in existence on June 30, 2025, except that any 1137 amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall be 1138 preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such 1139 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which 1140 expire pursuant to this section. 1141 Section 27.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, and in 1142 order to implement Specific Appropriation 382 of the 2026-2027 1143 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (c) of subsection (9) of 1144 section 394.9082, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1145 394.9082âBehavioral health managing entities.â 1146 (9)âFUNDING FOR MANAGING ENTITIES.â 1147 (c)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), for the 2026-2027 2025 1148 2026 fiscal year, a managing entity may carry forward documented 1149 unexpended funds appropriated from the State Opioid Settlement 1150 Trust Fund from 1 fiscal year to the next. Nonqualified funds 1151 carried forward pursuant to this paragraph are not included in 1152 the 8 percent cumulative cap that may be carried forward. This 1153 paragraph expires July 1, 2027 2026. 1154 Section 28.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1155 324A, 339, 339B, and 384A of the 2026-2027 General 1156 Appropriations Act, subsection (10) is added to section 1157 409.9913, Florida Statutes, to read: 1158 409.9913âFunding methodology to allocate funding to lead 1159 agencies.â 1160 (10)âNotwithstanding the provisions of this section, core 1161 services funding shall be allocated as provided in the General 1162 Appropriations Act. The department shall use the Tiered Funding 1163 Model developed and submitted to the Legislature pursuant to 1164 section 34 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, as the baseline 1165 framework for any updates, refinements, or enhancements to the 1166 model and shall continue to collect detailed cost, expenditure, 1167 and census data from community-based care lead agencies. 1168 (a)âEach lead agency shall submit any cost, expenditure, 1169 and census data requested by the department to support the 1170 continued development and refinement of the Tiered Funding 1171 Model. Lead agencies shall complete and validate a standardized 1172 expenditure report template in the form and manner prescribed by 1173 the department. 1174 (b)âThe department shall conduct ongoing performance 1175 monitoring by comparing trends in individual metrics against 1176 broader indicators of system health and shall analyze emerging 1177 market trends that may impact organizational financial 1178 stability. The departmentâs analysis and reporting shall include 1179 a comprehensive explanation of the methodology used to establish 1180 residential group home rates, a description of the current rate 1181 setting processes employed by each community-based care lead 1182 agency, and recommendations to enhance the fiscal sustainability 1183 and transparency of those processes. 1184 (c)âBeginning in July 2026 and continuing through November 1185 2026, the department shall provide monthly status reports to the 1186 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 1187 House of Representatives detailing activities and progress 1188 related to the development of the funding methodology, including 1189 preliminary recommendations for adjustments for the subsequent 1190 fiscal year. 1191 (d)âBy December 1, 2026, the department shall submit a 1192 final report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and 1193 the Speaker of the House of Representatives that includes 1194 recommendations for adjustments to the funding methodology for 1195 the next fiscal year. The recommendations shall continue the 1196 Tiered Funding Model approach while proposing enhancements 1197 intended to strengthen operational and financial outcomes. 1198 (e)âThis subsection expires July 1, 2027. 1199 Section 29.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1200 324A, 339, 339B, and 384A and section 74 of the 2026-2027 1201 General Appropriations Act, subsection (9) is added to section 1202 409.990, Florida Statutes, to read: 1203 409.990âFunding for lead agencies.âA contract established 1204 between the department and a lead agency must be funded by a 1205 grant of general revenue, other applicable state funds, or 1206 applicable federal funding sources. 1207 (9)âNotwithstanding subsection (5), all funds held by a 1208 lead agency carried forward pursuant to subsection (5) as of 1209 July 1, 2026, must be returned to the department. The department 1210 must hold such funds in a separate account and, by August 1, 1211 2026, report to the chair of the Senate Committee on 1212 Appropriations, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget 1213 Committee, and the Executive Office of the Governorâs Office of 1214 Policy and Budget the amount of funds returned by each lead 1215 agency. As of September 30, 2026, all funds returned pursuant to 1216 this subsection shall revert to the General Revenue Fund. This 1217 subsection expires July 1, 2027. 1218 Section 30.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1219 465 and 467 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 1220 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 1221 Department of Health may submit a budget amendment, subject to 1222 the notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, 1223 Florida Statutes, to increase budget authority for the 1224 Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children 1225 (WIC) and the Child Care Food Program if additional federal 1226 revenues will be expended in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This 1227 section expires July 1, 2027. 1228 Section 31.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1229 476 and 526 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 1230 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 1231 Department of Health may submit a budget amendment, subject to 1232 the notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, 1233 Florida Statutes, to increase budget authority for the HIV/AIDS 1234 Prevention and Treatment Program if additional federal revenues 1235 specific to HIV/AIDS prevention and treatment become available 1236 in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This section expires July 1, 2027. 1237 Section 32.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1238 432 through 593 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 1239 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 1240 Department of Health may submit a budget amendment, subject to 1241 the notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, 1242 Florida Statutes, to increase budget authority for the 1243 department if additional federal revenues specific to COVID-19 1244 relief funds become available in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This 1245 section expires July 1, 2027. 1246 Section 33.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 1247 203 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act: 1248 (1)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration shall replace 1249 the current Florida Medicaid Management Information System 1250 (FMMIS) and fiscal agent operations with a system that is 1251 modular, interoperable, and scalable for the Florida Medicaid 1252 program and that complies with all applicable federal and state 1253 laws and requirements. The agency may not include in the program 1254 to replace the current FMMIS and fiscal agent contract: 1255 (a)âFunctionality that duplicates any of the information 1256 systems of the other health and human services state agencies; 1257 (b)âProcurement for agency requirements external to 1258 Medicaid programs with the intent to leverage the Medicaid 1259 technology infrastructure for other purposes without legislative 1260 appropriation or legislative authorization to procure these 1261 requirements. The new system, the Florida Health Care Connection 1262 (FX) system, must provide better integration with subsystems 1263 supporting Floridaâs Medicaid program; uniformity, consistency, 1264 and improved access to data; and compatibility with the Centers 1265 for Medicare and Medicaid Servicesâ Medicaid Information 1266 Technology Architecture (MITA) as the system matures and expands 1267 its functionality; or 1268 (c)âAny contract executed after July 1, 2022, not including 1269 staff augmentation services purchased off the Department of 1270 Management Services Information Technology staff augmentation 1271 state term contract which are not deliverables based fixed price 1272 contracts. 1273 (2)âFor purposes of replacing FMMIS and the current 1274 Medicaid fiscal agent, the Agency for Health Care Administration 1275 shall: 1276 (a)âPrioritize procurements for the replacement of the 1277 current functions of FMMIS and the responsibilities of the 1278 current Medicaid fiscal agent, to minimize the need to extend 1279 all or portions of the current fiscal agent contract. 1280 (b)âComply with and not exceed the Centers for Medicare and 1281 Medicaid Services funding authorizations for the FX system. 1282 (c)âDevelop and mature an enterprise architecture framework 1283 to align the requirements of the FX project phases and 1284 overarching program objectives, including completing and 1285 maintaining key components such as the Business Capability Model 1286 and Business Value Model. 1287 (d)âApply value-based measures to support informed 1288 decisionmaking around release readiness and go-live criteria. 1289 These measures must be tracked and reported quarterly to the 1290 executive steering committee established in paragraph (k) post 1291 implementation to support performance monitoring and continuous 1292 improvement. 1293 (e)âThrough documented FX architecture governance 1294 practices, ensure that the Medicaid business needs and the 1295 business architecture are the primary drivers of information and 1296 technical architecture design decisions. All such decisions must 1297 be documented with traceable rationale to promote transparency 1298 and accountability across the program. The business, 1299 information, and technical architectures must align with the 1300 MITA framework where applicable. In areas where MITA guidance is 1301 not available, alignment will be maintained through adherence to 1302 The Open Group Architecture Framework (TOGAF). 1303 (f)âEnsure compliance and uniformity with the published 1304 MITA framework and guidelines. The agency shall: 1305 1.âImplement an Enterprise Architecture (EA) management 1306 tool that supports an integrated approach to FX program 1307 architecture. The EA tool must serve as a centralized repository 1308 for the FX Business Process Inventory and support the integrated 1309 management and oversight of the FX business, technical, and 1310 information architectures. 1311 2.âEstablish governance structures and define user roles 1312 within the EA tool for the business, technical, and information 1313 architecture components. 1314 (g)âEnsure that all business requirements and technical 1315 specifications have been provided to all affected state agencies 1316 for their review and input and approved by the executive 1317 steering committee. 1318 (h)âConsult with the Executive Office of the Governorâs 1319 working group for interagency information technology integration 1320 for the development of competitive solicitations that provide 1321 for data interoperability and shared information technology 1322 services across the stateâs health and human services agencies. 1323 (i)âImplement a data governance structure for the program 1324 to coordinate data sharing and interoperability across state 1325 health care entities. 1326 (j)âEstablish a continuing oversight team for each contract 1327 pursuant to s. 287.057(26), Florida Statutes. The teams must 1328 provide quarterly reports to the executive steering committee, 1329 summarizing the status of the contract, the pace of 1330 deliverables, the quality of deliverables, contractor 1331 responsiveness, and contractor performance. 1332 (k)âImplement a program governance structure that includes 1333 an executive steering committee composed of: 1334 1.âThe Secretary of Health Care Administration, or the 1335 executive sponsor of the program. 1336 2.âA representative of the Division of Health Care Finance 1337 and Data of the Agency for Health Care Administration, appointed 1338 by the Secretary of Health Care Administration. 1339 3.âTwo representatives from the Division of Medicaid 1340 Policy, Quality, and Operations of the Agency for Health Care 1341 Administration, appointed by the Secretary of Health Care 1342 Administration. 1343 4.âA representative of the Division of Health Care Policy 1344 and Oversight of the Agency for Health Care Administration, 1345 appointed by the Secretary of Health Care Administration. 1346 5.âA representative of the Florida Center for Health 1347 Information and Transparency of the Agency for Health Care 1348 Administration, appointed by the Secretary of Health Care 1349 Administration. 1350 6.âThe Chief Information Officer of the Agency for Health 1351 Care Administration, or his or her designee. 1352 (3)(a)âThe Secretary of Health Care Administration or the 1353 executive sponsor of the program shall serve as chair of the 1354 executive steering committee, and the committee shall take 1355 action by a vote of at least 5 affirmative votes with the chair 1356 voting on the prevailing side. A quorum of the executive 1357 steering committee consists of at least 5 members. 1358 (b)1.âThe chair shall establish a program finance and 1359 contracting working group composed of: 1360 a.âThe FX program director. 1361 b.âA representative from the agencyâs Office of the General 1362 Counsel. 1363 c.âA representative from the agencyâs Division of 1364 Administration. 1365 d.âRepresentatives from each continuing oversight team. 1366 e.âThe FX program strategic roadmap manager. 1367 f.âThe FX program project managers. 1368 g.âThe FX program risk manager. 1369 h.âAny other personnel deemed necessary by the chair. 1370 2.âThe working group shall meet at least monthly to review 1371 the program status and all contract and program operations, 1372 policies, risks, and issues related to the budget, spending 1373 plans and contractual obligations, and shall develop 1374 recommendations to the executive steering committee for 1375 improvement. The working group shall review all change requests 1376 that impact the programâs scope, schedule, or budget related to 1377 contract management and vendor payments and submit those 1378 recommended for adoption to the executive steering committee. 1379 The chair shall request input from the working group on agenda 1380 items for each scheduled meeting. The program shall make 1381 available program staff to the group, as needed, for the group 1382 to fulfill its duties. 1383 (c)1.âThe chair shall establish a state agency stakeholder 1384 working group composed of: 1385 a.âThe executive sponsor of the FX program. 1386 b.âA representative of the Department of Children and 1387 Families, appointed by the Secretary of Children and Families. 1388 c.âA representative of the Department of Health, appointed 1389 by the State Surgeon General. 1390 d.âA representative of the Agency for Persons with 1391 Disabilities, appointed by the director of the Agency for 1392 Persons with Disabilities. 1393 e.âA representative from the Florida Healthy Kids 1394 Corporation. 1395 f.âA representative from the Department of Elderly Affairs, 1396 appointed by the Secretary of Elderly Affairs. 1397 g.âThe state chief information officer, or his or her 1398 designee. 1399 h.âA representative of the Department of Financial Services 1400 who has experience with the stateâs financial processes, 1401 including development of the PALM system, appointed by the Chief 1402 Financial Officer. 1403 2.âThe working group shall meet at least quarterly to 1404 review the program status and all program operations, policies, 1405 risks, and issues that may impact the operations external to the 1406 Agency for Health Care Administration FX program, and shall 1407 develop recommendations to the executive steering committee for 1408 improvement. The chair shall request input from the working 1409 group on agenda items for each scheduled meeting. The program 1410 shall make available program staff to the group to provide 1411 system demonstrations and any program documentation, as needed, 1412 for the group to fulfill its duties. 1413 (4)âThe executive steering committee has the overall 1414 responsibility for ensuring that the program to replace FMMIS 1415 and the Medicaid fiscal agent meets its primary business 1416 objectives and shall: 1417 (a)âIdentify and recommend to the Executive Office of the 1418 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 1419 House of Representatives any statutory changes needed to 1420 implement the modular replacement to standardize, to the fullest 1421 extent possible, the stateâs health care data and business 1422 processes. 1423 (b)âReview and approve any changes to the programâs scope, 1424 schedule, and budget. 1425 (c)âReview and approve any changes to the programâs 1426 strategic roadmap. 1427 (d)âReview and approve change requests that impact the 1428 programâs scope, schedule, or budget recommended for adoption by 1429 the program finance and contracting working group. 1430 (e)âReview recommendations provided by the program working 1431 groups. 1432 (f)âReview vendor scorecards, reports, and notifications 1433 produced by the continuing oversight teams. 1434 (g)âEnsure that adequate resources are provided throughout 1435 all phases of the program. 1436 (h)âApprove all major program deliverables. 1437 (i)âReview and verify that all procurement and contractual 1438 documents associated with the replacement of the current FMMIS 1439 and Medicaid fiscal agent align with the scope, schedule, and 1440 anticipated budget for the program. 1441 (5)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 1442 Section 34.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 1443 203 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the Agency for 1444 Health Care Administration shall contract for a comprehensive, 1445 independent technical architecture and feasibility assessment of 1446 the agencyâs Medicaid management information system (MMIS), 1447 including components completed under the FX project. 1448 (1)âThe assessment must evaluate the agencyâs current 1449 technical architecture and technology standards related to its 1450 MMIS replacement activities and assess alignment with all 1451 applicable federal and state laws and requirements, including, 1452 but not limited to, the federal Centers for Medicare and 1453 Medicaid Services (CMS) Interoperability and Patient Access Rule 1454 (CMS-9115), the Medicaid Information Technology Architecture 1455 (MITA) frameworks and guidelines, and recognized industry and 1456 governmental best practices, including CMS modularity guidance 1457 and National Institute of Standards and Technology cybersecurity 1458 standards. 1459 (2)âThe assessment must, at a minimum: 1460 (a)âIdentify and document current deficiencies in the 1461 technical architecture, system design, and standards that may 1462 affect long-term sustainability, including issues related to 1463 maintainability, scalability, security, interoperability, 1464 technical debt, vendor dependency, and compliance with evolving 1465 federal and state requirements. 1466 (b)âDevelop a future-state technical architecture that is 1467 driven by and aligned with the business architecture, Medicaid 1468 program needs, and CMS modularity and interoperability 1469 principles, including identification of core components, 1470 interfaces, data flows, and applicable standards. 1471 (c)âEvaluate the feasibility of transitioning from the 1472 current-state architecture to the future-state architecture, 1473 including phased or modular implementation options, associated 1474 risks, estimated costs, implementation timelines, operational 1475 impacts, and implications for federal funding eligibility. 1476 (d)âPrioritize replacement of the functionality provided 1477 under the current fiscal agent contract and recommend a 1478 sustainable path forward, including identification of any 1479 prerequisite governance, policy, or remediation actions required 1480 prior to implementation. 1481 (e)âAssess the agencyâs readiness to implement and operate 1482 the recommended solution, including evaluation of governance 1483 structures, staffing capacity, and resource sufficiency. 1484 (3)âThe completed assessment must be submitted 1485 simultaneously to the Agency for Health Care Administration, the 1486 chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, the chair of 1487 the House of Representatives Budget Committee, and the Executive 1488 Office of the Governorâs Office of Policy and Budget by January 1489 8, 2027. 1490 (4)âBased on the results of the assessment, the Agency for 1491 Health Care Administration shall develop a new time-phased 1492 implementation roadmap with measurable success criteria for the 1493 MMIS replacement that aligns investments with the agencyâs 1494 Medicaid program goals and business strategy. The agency must 1495 submit the roadmap to chair of the Senate Committee on 1496 Appropriations, the chair of the House of Representatives Budget 1497 Committee, and the Executive Office of the Governorâs Office of 1498 Policy and Budget by February 2, 2027. 1499 (5)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 1500 Section 35.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1501 223, 224, 279, 290, 349, 503, 526, and 751 of the 2026-2027 1502 General Appropriations Act, the Agency for Health Care 1503 Administration, in consultation with the Department of Health, 1504 the Agency for Persons with Disabilities, the Department of 1505 Children and Families, and the Department of Corrections, shall 1506 competitively procure a contract with a vendor to negotiate, for 1507 these agencies, prices for prescribed drugs and biological 1508 products excluded from the program established under s. 1509 381.02035, Florida Statutes, and ineligible under 21 U.S.C. s. 1510 384, including, but not limited to, insulin and epinephrine. The 1511 contract may allow the vendor to directly purchase these 1512 products for participating agencies when feasible and 1513 advantageous. The contracted vendor must be compensated on a 1514 contingency basis, paid from a portion of the savings achieved 1515 by its price negotiation or purchase of the prescription drugs 1516 and products. This section expires July 1, 2027. 1517 Section 36.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1518 238 through 245 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 1519 notwithstanding ss. 408.040(2) and 408.808(3), Florida Statutes: 1520 (1)(a)âAn inactive license or a partially inactive license 1521 with an expiration date on or after June 1, 2024, may be issued 1522 or renewed to a skilled nursing provider subject to the 1523 certificate-of-need provisions in part I of chapter 408, Florida 1524 Statutes, if the provider currently holds an active or inactive 1525 license, does not have a provisional license, and will be 1526 temporarily unable to provide services due to impacts from a 1527 natural disaster or state of emergency; or will be deactivating 1528 or has deactivated beds to improve and modernize the licensees 1529 physical plant, but is reasonably expected to resume services 1530 within 48 months. 1531 (b)âSuch issuance or renewal may be made for a period of 12 1532 months and may be further renewed for up to 36 additional months 1533 upon demonstration by the licensee of the providerâs progress 1534 toward reopening. During each 12-month renewal cycle, the 1535 applicant shall attest that good-faith progress towards 1536 commencement of the project is ongoing or that the project is 1537 delayed by litigation or by governmental action or inaction with 1538 respect to regulations or permitting that precludes commencement 1539 of the project. 1540 (2)(a)âThe certificate-of-need validity period for a 1541 project shall be extended by the agency if the certificateholder 1542 demonstrates to the satisfaction of the agency that good-faith 1543 progress toward the commencement of the project is ongoing or 1544 that the project is delayed by litigation or by government 1545 action or inaction with respect to regulations or permitting 1546 that precludes commencement of the project. 1547 (b)âSuch extension may be made for a period of 12 months 1548 and may be renewed for up to 36 additional months upon 1549 demonstration by the certificateholder of the progress towards 1550 opening. During each 12-month validity period renewal cycle, the 1551 certificateholder shall attest that good-faith progress towards 1552 commencement of the project is ongoing or that the project is 1553 being delayed by litigation or by governmental action or 1554 inaction. 1555 (3)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 1556 Section 37.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1557 272, 277, 278, 283, 288, and 289 of the 2026-2027 General 1558 Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, 1559 Florida Statutes, the Agency for Persons with Disabilities may 1560 submit budget amendments, subject to the notice, review, and 1561 objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to 1562 transfer funding from the Salaries and Benefits appropriation 1563 categories to categories used for contractual services in order 1564 to support additional staff augmentation resources needed at the 1565 Developmental Disability Centers. This section expires July 1, 1566 2027. 1567 Section 38.âIn order to implement section 66 of the 2026 1568 2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 1569 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the Agency for Persons with 1570 Disabilities may submit budget amendments, subject to the 1571 notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida 1572 Statutes, to request the appropriation of funds from the Lump 1573 Sum-Home and Community-Based Services Waiver category to address 1574 any deficits or funding shortfalls. This section expires July 1, 1575 2027. 1576 Section 39.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1577 231 and 254 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 1578 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 1579 Agency for Health Care Administration and the Agency for Persons 1580 with Disabilities may submit budget amendments, subject to the 1581 notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida 1582 Statutes, at least 3 days before the effective date of the 1583 action, to increase budget authority to support the 1584 implementation of the home and community-based services Medicaid 1585 waiver program of the Agency for Persons with Disabilities. This 1586 section expires July 1, 2027. 1587 Section 40.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 1588 594 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 1589 notwithstanding chapter 216, Florida Statutes, the Department of 1590 Veteransâ Affairs may submit a budget amendment, subject to 1591 Legislative Budget Commission approval, requesting the authority 1592 to establish positions in excess of the number authorized by the 1593 Legislature, increase appropriations from the Operations and 1594 Maintenance Trust Fund, or provide a necessary salary rate 1595 sufficient to provide for essential staff for veteransâ nursing 1596 homes, if the department projects that additional direct care 1597 staff are needed to meet its established staffing ratio. This 1598 section expires July 1, 2027. 1599 Section 41.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 1600 223 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (1) 1601 of section 409.915, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1602 409.915âCounty contributions to Medicaid.âAlthough the 1603 state is responsible for the full portion of the state share of 1604 the matching funds required for the Medicaid program, the state 1605 shall charge the counties an annual contribution in order to 1606 acquire a certain portion of these funds. 1607 (1)(a)âAs used in this section, the term âstate Medicaid 1608 expendituresâ means those expenditures used as matching funds 1609 for the federal Medicaid program. 1610 (b)âThe term does not include funds specially assessed by 1611 any local governmental entity and used as the nonfederal share 1612 for the hospital directed payment program after July 1, 2021. 1613 This paragraph expires July 1, 2027 2026. 1614 Section 42.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1615 594 through 622A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 1616 and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, 1617 the Department of Veteransâ Affairs is authorized to: 1618 (1)âExpend funds pursuant to a Memorandum of Agreement 1619 between the department and the Collier County Board of County 1620 Commissioners, as well as funds appropriated in chapter 2023 1621 239, Laws of Florida, for the planning and construction of a new 1622 State Veteransâ Nursing Home and Adult Day Health Center in 1623 Collier County. 1624 (2)âApply for a U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs 1625 Construction Grant for the Collier County State Veteransâ 1626 Nursing Home. 1627 (3)âSubmit budget amendments subject to the notice, review, 1628 and objection procedures in s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, 1629 subject to federal approval, requesting additional spending 1630 authority to support the development and construction of a new 1631 State Veteransâ Nursing Home and Adult Day Health Care Center in 1632 Collier County. 1633 1634 This section expires July 1, 2027. 1635 Section 43.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1636 404 and 406 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 1637 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 1638 Department of Elderly Affairs may submit a budget amendment, 1639 subject to the notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 1640 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget authority for the 1641 United States Department of Agricultureâs Adult Care Food 1642 Program or the Older Americans Act if additional federal 1643 revenues will be expended in the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This 1644 section expires July 1, 2027. 1645 Section 44.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1646 626 through 718 and 729 through 782 of the 2026-2027 General 1647 Appropriations Act, subsection (4) of section 216.262, Florida 1648 Statutes, is amended to read: 1649 216.262âAuthorized positions.â 1650 (4)âNotwithstanding the provisions of this chapter relating 1651 to increasing the number of authorized positions, and for the 1652 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year only, if the actual inmate 1653 population of the Department of Corrections exceeds the inmate 1654 population projections of the December 23 February 21, 2025, 1655 Criminal Justice Estimating Conference by 1 percent for 2 1656 consecutive months or 2 percent for any month, the Executive 1657 Office of the Governor, with the approval of the Legislative 1658 Budget Commission, shall immediately notify the Criminal Justice 1659 Estimating Conference, which shall convene as soon as possible 1660 to revise the estimates. The Department of Corrections may then 1661 submit a budget amendment requesting the establishment of 1662 positions in excess of the number authorized by the Legislature 1663 and additional appropriations from unallocated general revenue 1664 sufficient to provide for essential staff, fixed capital 1665 improvements, and other resources to provide classification, 1666 security, food services, health services, and other variable 1667 expenses within the institutions to accommodate the estimated 1668 increase in the inmate population. All actions taken pursuant to 1669 this subsection are subject to review and approval by the 1670 Legislative Budget Commission. This subsection expires July 1, 1671 2027 2026. 1672 Section 45.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1673 3340 through 3409 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 1674 subsection (2) of section 215.18, Florida Statutes, is amended 1675 to read: 1676 215.18âTransfers between funds; limitation.â 1677 (2)âThe Chief Justice of the Supreme Court may receive one 1678 or more trust fund loans to ensure that the state court system 1679 has funds sufficient to meet its appropriations in the 2026-2027 1680 2025-2026 General Appropriations Act. If the Chief Justice 1681 accesses the loan, he or she must notify the Governor and the 1682 chairs of the legislative appropriations committees in writing. 1683 The loan must come from other funds in the State Treasury which 1684 are for the time being or otherwise in excess of the amounts 1685 necessary to meet the just requirements of such last-mentioned 1686 funds. The Governor shall order the transfer of funds within 5 1687 days after the written notification from the Chief Justice. If 1688 the Governor does not order the transfer, the Chief Financial 1689 Officer shall transfer the requested funds. The loan of funds 1690 from which any money is temporarily transferred must be repaid 1691 by the end of the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year. This 1692 subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026. 1693 Section 46.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1694 1183 through 1194 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act: 1695 (1)âThe Department of Juvenile Justice shall review county 1696 juvenile detention payments to ensure that counties fulfill 1697 their financial responsibilities required in s. 985.6865, 1698 Florida Statutes. If the Department of Juvenile Justice 1699 determines that a county has not met its obligations, the 1700 department shall direct the Department of Revenue to deduct the 1701 amount owed to the Department of Juvenile Justice from the funds 1702 provided to the county under s. 218.23, Florida Statutes. The 1703 Department of Revenue shall transfer the funds withheld to the 1704 Shared County/State Juvenile Detention Trust Fund. 1705 (2)âAs an assurance to holders of bonds issued by counties 1706 before July 1, 2026, for which distributions made pursuant to s. 1707 218.23, Florida Statutes, are pledged, or bonds issued to refund 1708 such bonds which mature no later than the bonds they refunded 1709 and which result in a reduction of debt service payable in each 1710 fiscal year, the amount available for distribution to a county 1711 shall remain as provided by law and continue to be subject to 1712 any lien or claim on behalf of the bondholders. The Department 1713 of Revenue must ensure, based on information provided by an 1714 affected county, that any reduction in amounts distributed 1715 pursuant to subsection (1) does not reduce the amount of 1716 distribution to a county below the amount necessary for the 1717 timely payment of principal and interest when due on the bonds 1718 and the amount necessary to comply with any covenant under the 1719 bond resolution or other documents relating to the issuance of 1720 the bonds. If a reduction to a countyâs monthly distribution 1721 must be decreased in order to comply with this section, the 1722 Department of Revenue must notify the Department of Juvenile 1723 Justice of the amount of the decrease, and the Department of 1724 Juvenile Justice must send a bill for payment of such amount to 1725 the affected county. 1726 (3)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 1727 Section 47.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1728 793 through 817A, 978 through 1125, and 1146 through 1182 of the 1729 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding the 1730 expiration date in section 52 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of 1731 Florida, subsection (1), paragraph (a) of subsection (2), 1732 paragraph (a) of subsection (3), and subsections (5), (6), and 1733 (7) of section 27.40, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 1734 27.40âCourt-appointed counsel; circuit registries; minimum 1735 requirements; appointment by court.â 1736 (1)âCounsel shall be appointed to represent any individual 1737 in a criminal or civil proceeding entitled to court-appointed 1738 counsel under the Federal or State Constitution or as authorized 1739 by general law. The court shall appoint a public defender to 1740 represent indigent persons as authorized in s. 27.51. The office 1741 of criminal conflict and civil regional counsel shall be 1742 appointed to represent persons in those cases in which provision 1743 is made for court-appointed counsel, but only after the public 1744 defender has certified to the court in writing that the public 1745 defender is unable to provide representation due to a conflict 1746 of interest or is not authorized to provide representation. The 1747 public defender shall report, in the aggregate, the specific 1748 basis of all conflicts of interest certified to the court. On a 1749 quarterly basis, the public defender shall submit this 1750 information to the Justice Administrative Commission. 1751 (2)(a)âPrivate counsel shall be appointed to represent 1752 persons in those cases in which provision is made for court 1753 appointed counsel but only after the office of criminal conflict 1754 and civil regional counsel has been appointed and has certified 1755 to the court in writing that the criminal conflict and civil 1756 regional counsel is unable to provide representation due to a 1757 conflict of interest. The criminal conflict and civil regional 1758 counsel shall report, in the aggregate, the specific basis of 1759 all conflicts of interest certified to the court. On a quarterly 1760 basis, the criminal conflict and civil regional counsel shall 1761 submit this information to the Justice Administrative 1762 Commission. 1763 (3)âIn using a registry: 1764 (a)âThe chief judge of the circuit shall compile a list of 1765 attorneys in private practice, by county and by category of 1766 cases, and provide the list to the clerk of court in each 1767 county. The chief judge of the circuit may restrict the number 1768 of attorneys on the general registry list. To be included on a 1769 registry, an attorney must certify that he or she: 1770 1.âMeets any minimum requirements established by the chief 1771 judge and by general law for court appointment; 1772 2.âIs available to represent indigent defendants in cases 1773 requiring court appointment of private counsel; and 1774 3.âIs willing to abide by the terms of the contract for 1775 services, s. 27.5304, and this section. 1776 1777 To be included on a registry, an attorney must enter into a 1778 contract for services with the Justice Administrative 1779 Commission. Failure to comply with the terms of the contract for 1780 services may result in termination of the contract and removal 1781 from the registry. Each attorney on the registry is responsible 1782 for notifying the clerk of the court and the Justice 1783 Administrative Commission of any change in his or her status. 1784 Failure to comply with this requirement is cause for termination 1785 of the contract for services and removal from the registry until 1786 the requirement is fulfilled. 1787 (5)âThe Justice Administrative Commission shall approve 1788 uniform contract forms for use in procuring the services of 1789 private court-appointed counsel and uniform procedures and forms 1790 for use by a court-appointed attorney in support of billing for 1791 attorneyâs fees, costs, and related expenses to demonstrate the 1792 attorneyâs completion of specified duties. Such uniform 1793 contracts and forms for use in billing must be consistent with 1794 s. 27.5304, s. 216.311, and the General Appropriations Act and 1795 must contain the following statement: âThe State of Floridaâs 1796 performance and obligation to pay under this contract is 1797 contingent upon an annual appropriation by the Legislature.â 1798 (6)âAfter court appointment, the attorney must immediately 1799 file a notice of appearance with the court indicating acceptance 1800 of the appointment to represent the defendant and of the terms 1801 of the uniform contract as specified in subsection (5). 1802 (7)(a)âA private attorney appointed by the court from the 1803 registry to represent a client is entitled to payment as 1804 provided in s. 27.5304 so long as the requirements of subsection 1805 (1) and paragraph (2)(a) are met. An attorney appointed by the 1806 court who is not on the registry list may be compensated under 1807 s. 27.5304 only if the court finds in the order of appointment 1808 that there were no registry attorneys available for 1809 representation for that case and only if the requirements of 1810 subsection (1) and paragraph (2)(a) are met. 1811 (b)1.âThe flat fee established in s. 27.5304 and the 1812 General Appropriations Act shall be presumed by the court to be 1813 sufficient compensation. The attorney shall maintain appropriate 1814 documentation, including contemporaneous and detailed hourly 1815 accounting of time spent representing the client. If the 1816 attorney fails to maintain such contemporaneous and detailed 1817 hourly records, the attorney waives the right to seek 1818 compensation in excess of the flat fee established in s. 27.5304 1819 and the General Appropriations Act. These records and documents 1820 are subject to review by the Justice Administrative Commission 1821 and audit by the Auditor General, subject to the attorney-client 1822 privilege and work-product privilege. The attorney shall 1823 maintain the records and documents in a manner that enables the 1824 attorney to redact any information subject to a privilege in 1825 order to facilitate the commissionâs review of the records and 1826 documents and not to impede such review. The attorney may redact 1827 information from the records and documents only to the extent 1828 necessary to comply with the privilege. The Justice 1829 Administrative Commission shall review such records and shall 1830 contemporaneously document such review before authorizing 1831 payment to an attorney. Objections by or on behalf of the 1832 Justice Administrative Commission to records or documents or to 1833 claims for payment by the attorney shall be presumed correct by 1834 the court unless the court determines, in writing, that 1835 competent and substantial evidence exists to justify overcoming 1836 the presumption. 1837 2.âIf an attorney fails, refuses, or declines to permit the 1838 commission or the Auditor General to review documentation for a 1839 case as provided in this paragraph, the attorney waives the 1840 right to seek, and the commission may not pay, compensation in 1841 excess of the flat fee established in s. 27.5304 and the General 1842 Appropriations Act for that case. 1843 3.âA finding by the commission that an attorney has waived 1844 the right to seek compensation in excess of the flat fee 1845 established in s. 27.5304 and the General Appropriations Act, as 1846 provided in this paragraph, shall be presumed to be correct, 1847 unless the court determines, in writing, that competent and 1848 substantial evidence exists to justify overcoming the 1849 presumption. 1850 Section 48.âThe text of s. 27.40(1), (2)(a), (3)(a), (5), 1851 (6), and (7), Florida Statutes, as carried forward from chapter 1852 2019-116, Laws of Florida, by this act expires July 1, 2027, and 1853 the text of those subsections and paragraphs, as applicable, 1854 shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2019, except that 1855 any amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall 1856 be preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such 1857 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which 1858 expire pursuant to this section. 1859 Section 49.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 1860 793 through 817A, 978 through 1125, and 1146 through 1182 of the 1861 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding the 1862 expiration date in section 54 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of 1863 Florida, subsection (13) of section 27.5304, Florida Statutes, 1864 is amended, and subsections (1), (3), (6), (7), and (11) and 1865 paragraphs (a) through (e) of subsection (12) of that section 1866 are reenacted, to read: 1867 27.5304âPrivate court-appointed counsel; compensation; 1868 notice.â 1869 (1)âPrivate court-appointed counsel appointed in the manner 1870 prescribed in s. 27.40(1) and (2)(a) shall be compensated by the 1871 Justice Administrative Commission only as provided in this 1872 section and the General Appropriations Act. The flat fees 1873 prescribed in this section are limitations on compensation. The 1874 specific flat fee amounts for compensation shall be established 1875 annually in the General Appropriations Act. The attorney also 1876 shall be reimbursed for reasonable and necessary expenses in 1877 accordance with s. 29.007. If the attorney is representing a 1878 defendant charged with more than one offense in the same case, 1879 the attorney shall be compensated at the rate provided for the 1880 most serious offense for which he or she represented the 1881 defendant. This section does not allow stacking of the fee 1882 limits established by this section. 1883 (3)âThe court retains primary authority and responsibility 1884 for determining the reasonableness of all billings for attorney 1885 fees, costs, and related expenses, subject to statutory 1886 limitations and the requirements of s. 27.40(7). Private court 1887 appointed counsel is entitled to compensation upon final 1888 disposition of a case. 1889 (6)âFor compensation for representation pursuant to a court 1890 appointment in a proceeding under chapter 39: 1891 (a)âAt the trial level, compensation for representation for 1892 dependency proceedings shall not exceed $1,450 for the first 1893 year following the date of appointment and shall not exceed $700 1894 each year thereafter. Compensation shall be paid based upon 1895 representation of a parent irrespective of the number of case 1896 numbers that may be assigned or the number of children involved, 1897 including any children born during the pendency of the 1898 proceeding. Any appeal, except for an appeal from an 1899 adjudication of dependency, shall be completed by the trial 1900 attorney and is considered compensated by the flat fee for 1901 dependency proceedings. 1902 1.âCounsel may bill the flat fee not exceeding $1,450 1903 following disposition or upon dismissal of the petition. 1904 2.âCounsel may bill the annual flat fee not exceeding $700 1905 following the first judicial review in the second year following 1906 the date of appointment and each year thereafter as long as the 1907 case remains under protective supervision. 1908 3.âIf the court grants a motion to reactivate protective 1909 supervision, the attorney shall receive the annual flat fee not 1910 exceeding $700 following the first judicial review and up to an 1911 additional $700 each year thereafter. 1912 4.âIf, during the course of dependency proceedings, a 1913 proceeding to terminate parental rights is initiated, 1914 compensation shall be as set forth in paragraph (b). If counsel 1915 handling the dependency proceeding is not authorized to handle 1916 proceedings to terminate parental rights, the counsel must 1917 withdraw and new counsel must be appointed. 1918 (b)âAt the trial level, compensation for representation in 1919 termination of parental rights proceedings shall not exceed 1920 $1,800 for the first year following the date of appointment and 1921 shall not exceed $700 each year thereafter. Compensation shall 1922 be paid based upon representation of a parent irrespective of 1923 the number of case numbers that may be assigned or the number of 1924 children involved, including any children born during the 1925 pendency of the proceeding. Any appeal, except for an appeal 1926 from an order granting or denying termination of parental 1927 rights, shall be completed by trial counsel and is considered 1928 compensated by the flat fee for termination of parental rights 1929 proceedings. If the individual has dependency proceedings 1930 ongoing as to other children, those proceedings are considered 1931 part of the termination of parental rights proceedings as long 1932 as that termination of parental rights proceeding is ongoing. 1933 1.âCounsel may bill the flat fee not exceeding $1,800 30 1934 days after rendition of the final order. Each request for 1935 payment submitted to the Justice Administrative Commission must 1936 include the trial counselâs certification that: 1937 a.âCounsel discussed grounds for appeal with the parent or 1938 that counsel attempted and was unable to contact the parent; and 1939 b.âNo appeal will be filed or that a notice of appeal and a 1940 motion for appointment of appellate counsel, containing the 1941 signature of the parent, have been filed. 1942 2.âCounsel may bill the annual flat fee not exceeding $700 1943 following the first judicial review in the second year after the 1944 date of appointment and each year thereafter as long as the 1945 termination of parental rights proceedings are still ongoing. 1946 (c)âFor appeals from an adjudication of dependency, 1947 compensation may not exceed $1,800. 1948 1.âCounsel may bill a flat fee not exceeding $1,200 upon 1949 filing the initial brief or the granting of a motion to 1950 withdraw. 1951 2.âIf a brief is filed, counsel may bill an additional flat 1952 fee not exceeding $600 upon rendition of the mandate. 1953 (d)âFor an appeal from an adjudication of termination of 1954 parental rights, compensation may not exceed $3,500. 1955 1.âCounsel may bill a flat fee not exceeding $1,750 upon 1956 filing the initial brief or the granting of a motion to 1957 withdraw. 1958 2.âIf a brief is filed, counsel may bill an additional flat 1959 fee not exceeding $1,750 upon rendition of the mandate. 1960 (7)âCounsel eligible to receive compensation from the state 1961 for representation pursuant to court appointment made in 1962 accordance with the requirements of s. 27.40(1) and (2)(a) in a 1963 proceeding under chapter 384, chapter 390, chapter 392, chapter 1964 393, chapter 394, chapter 397, chapter 415, chapter 743, chapter 1965 744, or chapter 984 shall receive compensation not to exceed the 1966 limits prescribed in the General Appropriations Act. Any such 1967 compensation must be determined as provided in s. 27.40(7). 1968 (11)âIt is the intent of the Legislature that the flat fees 1969 prescribed under this section and the General Appropriations Act 1970 comprise the full and complete compensation for private court 1971 appointed counsel. It is further the intent of the Legislature 1972 that the fees in this section are prescribed for the purpose of 1973 providing counsel with notice of the limit on the amount of 1974 compensation for representation in particular proceedings and 1975 the sole procedure and requirements for obtaining payment for 1976 the same. 1977 (a)âIf court-appointed counsel moves to withdraw prior to 1978 the full performance of his or her duties through the completion 1979 of the case, the court shall presume that the attorney is not 1980 entitled to the payment of the full flat fee established under 1981 this section and the General Appropriations Act. 1982 (b)âIf court-appointed counsel is allowed to withdraw from 1983 representation prior to the full performance of his or her 1984 duties through the completion of the case and the court appoints 1985 a subsequent attorney, the total compensation for the initial 1986 and any and all subsequent attorneys may not exceed the flat fee 1987 established under this section and the General Appropriations 1988 Act, except as provided in subsection (12). 1989 1990 This subsection constitutes notice to any subsequently appointed 1991 attorney that he or she will not be compensated the full flat 1992 fee. 1993 (12)âThe Legislature recognizes that on rare occasions an 1994 attorney may receive a case that requires extraordinary and 1995 unusual effort. 1996 (a)âIf counsel seeks compensation that exceeds the limits 1997 prescribed by law, he or she must file a motion with the chief 1998 judge for an order approving payment of attorney fees in excess 1999 of these limits. 2000 1.âBefore filing the motion, the counsel shall deliver a 2001 copy of the intended billing, together with supporting 2002 affidavits and all other necessary documentation, to the Justice 2003 Administrative Commission. 2004 2.âThe Justice Administrative Commission shall review the 2005 billings, affidavit, and documentation for completeness and 2006 compliance with contractual and statutory requirements and shall 2007 contemporaneously document such review before authorizing 2008 payment to an attorney. If the Justice Administrative Commission 2009 objects to any portion of the proposed billing, the objection 2010 and supporting reasons must be communicated in writing to the 2011 private court-appointed counsel. The counsel may thereafter file 2012 his or her motion, which must specify whether the commission 2013 objects to any portion of the billing or the sufficiency of 2014 documentation, and shall attach the commissionâs letter stating 2015 its objection. 2016 (b)âFollowing receipt of the motion to exceed the fee 2017 limits, the chief judge or a single designee shall hold an 2018 evidentiary hearing. The chief judge may select only one judge 2019 per circuit to hear and determine motions pursuant to this 2020 subsection, except multicounty circuits and the eleventh circuit 2021 may have up to two designees. 2022 1.âAt the hearing, the attorney seeking compensation must 2023 prove by competent and substantial evidence that the case 2024 required extraordinary and unusual efforts. The chief judge or 2025 single designee shall consider criteria such as the number of 2026 witnesses, the complexity of the factual and legal issues, and 2027 the length of trial. The fact that a trial was conducted in a 2028 case does not, by itself, constitute competent substantial 2029 evidence of an extraordinary and unusual effort. In a criminal 2030 case, relief under this section may not be granted if the number 2031 of work hours does not exceed 75 or the number of the stateâs 2032 witnesses deposed does not exceed 20. 2033 2.âObjections by or on behalf of the Justice Administrative 2034 Commission to records or documents or to claims for payment by 2035 the attorney shall be presumed correct by the court unless the 2036 court determines, in writing, that competent and substantial 2037 evidence exists to justify overcoming the presumption. The chief 2038 judge or single designee shall enter a written order detailing 2039 his or her findings and identifying the extraordinary nature of 2040 the time and efforts of the attorney in the case which warrant 2041 exceeding the flat fee established by this section and the 2042 General Appropriations Act. 2043 (c)âA copy of the motion and attachments shall be served on 2044 the Justice Administrative Commission at least 20 business days 2045 before the date of a hearing. The Justice Administrative 2046 Commission has standing to appear before the court, and may 2047 appear in person or telephonically, including at the hearing 2048 under paragraph (b), to contest any motion for an order 2049 approving payment of attorney fees, costs, or related expenses 2050 and may participate in a hearing on the motion by use of 2051 telephonic or other communication equipment. The Justice 2052 Administrative Commission may contract with other public or 2053 private entities or individuals to appear before the court for 2054 the purpose of contesting any motion for an order approving 2055 payment of attorney fees, costs, or related expenses. The fact 2056 that the Justice Administrative Commission has not objected to 2057 any portion of the billing or to the sufficiency of the 2058 documentation is not binding on the court. 2059 (d)âIf the chief judge or a single designee finds that 2060 counsel has proved by competent and substantial evidence that 2061 the case required extraordinary and unusual efforts, the chief 2062 judge or single designee shall order the compensation to be paid 2063 to the attorney at a percentage above the flat fee rate, 2064 depending on the extent of the unusual and extraordinary effort 2065 required. The percentage must be only the rate necessary to 2066 ensure that the fees paid are not confiscatory under common law. 2067 The percentage may not exceed 200 percent of the established 2068 flat fee, absent a specific finding that 200 percent of the flat 2069 fee in the case would be confiscatory. If the chief judge or 2070 single designee determines that 200 percent of the flat fee 2071 would be confiscatory, he or she shall order the amount of 2072 compensation using an hourly rate not to exceed $75 per hour for 2073 a noncapital case and $100 per hour for a capital case. However, 2074 the compensation calculated by using the hourly rate shall be 2075 only that amount necessary to ensure that the total fees paid 2076 are not confiscatory, subject to the requirements of s. 2077 27.40(7). 2078 (e)âAny order granting relief under this subsection must be 2079 attached to the final request for a payment submitted to the 2080 Justice Administrative Commission and must satisfy the 2081 requirements of subparagraph (b)2. 2082 (13)âNotwithstanding the limitation set forth in subsection 2083 (5) and for the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year only, the 2084 compensation for representation in a criminal proceeding may not 2085 exceed the following: 2086 (a)âFor misdemeanors and juveniles represented at the trial 2087 level: $2,000. 2088 (b)âFor noncapital, nonlife felonies represented at the 2089 trial level: $15,000. 2090 (c)âFor life felonies represented at the trial level: 2091 $15,000. 2092 (d)âFor capital cases represented at the trial level: 2093 $25,000. For purposes of this paragraph, a âcapital caseâ is any 2094 offense for which the potential sentence is death and the state 2095 has not waived seeking the death penalty. 2096 (e)âFor representation on appeal: $9,000. 2097 (f)âThis subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026. 2098 Section 50.âThe text of s. 27.5304(1), (3), (7), (11), and 2099 (12)(a)-(e), Florida Statutes, as carried forward from chapter 2100 2019-116, Laws of Florida, and the text of s. 27.5304(6), 2101 Florida Statutes, as carried forward from chapter 2023-240, Laws 2102 of Florida, by this act, expire July 1, 2027, and the text of 2103 those subsections and paragraphs, as applicable, shall revert to 2104 that in existence on June 30, 2019, except that any amendments 2105 to such text enacted other than by this act shall be preserved 2106 and continue to operate to the extent that such amendments are 2107 not dependent upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to 2108 this section. 2109 Section 51.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 2110 1348 through 1353 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 2111 subsection (3) of section 908.1033, Florida Statutes, is amended 2112 to read: 2113 908.1033âLocal Law Enforcement Immigration Grant Program.â 2114 (3)(a)âA local law enforcement agency may apply to the 2115 State Board of Immigration Enforcement to provide bonus payments 2116 for the agencyâs local law enforcement officers who participate 2117 in United States Department of Homeland Security at-large task 2118 force operations. The local law enforcement agency may apply for 2119 a bonus of up to $1,000 for each local law enforcement officer 2120 employed within that agency. The local law enforcement agency 2121 must certify to the board that the local law enforcement officer 2122 participated in one or more operations and provide any 2123 information required by the board. Eligible participation does 2124 not include operations occurring solely at state correctional 2125 facilities or county detention facilities. 2126 (b)âThe bonus payment shall be adjusted to include 7.65 2127 percent for the officersâ share of Federal Insurance 2128 Contribution Act tax on the bonus. 2129 (c)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), and for the 2026-2027 2130 2025-2026 fiscal year, a local law enforcement agency may apply 2131 to the State Board of Immigration Enforcement to provide bonus 2132 payments for the agencyâs certified correctional officers under 2133 s. 943.10(2), who are a warrant service officer under s. 287(g) 2134 of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1357 or an 2135 immigration officer under the jail enforcement model under s. 2136 287(g) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. s. 1357. 2137 The local law enforcement agency may apply for a bonus of up to 2138 $1,000 for each certified correctional officer employed with 2139 that county detention facility. The local law enforcement agency 2140 must certify to the board that the certified correctional 2141 officer acted in such capacity as a warrant service officer or 2142 an immigration officer under the jail enforcement model for at 2143 least 6 months preceding the application and provide any 2144 information required by the board. Eligible participation does 2145 not include operations occurring solely at state correctional 2146 facilities. This paragraph expires July 1, 2027 2026. 2147 Section 52.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 2148 1336A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (g) 2149 is added to subsection (7) of section 934.50, Florida Statutes, 2150 to read: 2151 934.50âSearches and seizure using a drone.â 2152 (7)âSECURITY STANDARDS FOR GOVERNMENTAL AGENCY DRONE USE.â 2153 (g)âSubject to appropriation, the Drone as First Responder 2154 Grant Program is created within the Department of Law 2155 Enforcement. 2156 1.âThe grant program shall provide funds to law enforcement 2157 agencies, fire service providers, ambulance crews, or other 2158 first responders that apply for funding to acquire new drones 2159 that comply with this section. To be eligible, the applicant 2160 must provide the department with any information the department 2161 deems necessary. A law enforcement agency, fire service, 2162 ambulance service, or other first responder agency may apply 2163 directly to the department or a local governmental entity may 2164 submit an application on behalf of one or more of its agencies 2165 to purchase one or more new drones. 2166 2.âThe department shall expeditiously develop an 2167 application process. Funds shall be allocated on a first-come, 2168 first-served basis, determined by the date the department 2169 receives the application. 2170 3.âGrants must be matched by at least 50 percent local 2171 funds, but the department may waive this requirement for 2172 agencies solely serving within a fiscally constrained county as 2173 described in s. 218.67(1), Florida Statutes. Each grant is 2174 limited to a total of $250,000 per agency and a maximum $50,000 2175 per drone. 2176 4. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term âfirst 2177 responder agencyâ has the same meaning as in s. 365.179(1)(a). 2178 5.âThe department may adopt rules to implement this 2179 paragraph. The department is authorized, and all conditions are 2180 deemed met, to adopt emergency rules under s. 120.54(4) for the 2181 purpose of implementing this paragraph. Notwithstanding any 2182 other law, emergency rules adopted under this section are 2183 effective for 12 months after adoption and may be renewed during 2184 the pendency of procedures to adopt permanent rules addressing 2185 the subject of the emergency rules. 2186 2187 This paragraph expires July 1, 2027. 2188 Section 53.âIn order to implement appropriations used to 2189 pay existing lease contracts for private lease space in excess 2190 of 2,000 square feet in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations 2191 Act, the Department of Management Services, with the cooperation 2192 of the agencies having the existing lease contracts for office 2193 or storage space, shall use tenant broker services to 2194 renegotiate or reprocure all private lease agreements for office 2195 or storage space which are expiring between July 1, 2027, and 2196 June 30, 2029, in order to reduce costs in future years. The 2197 department shall incorporate this initiative into its 2026 2198 master leasing report required under s. 255.249(7), Florida 2199 Statutes, and may use tenant broker services to explore the 2200 possibilities of colocating office or storage space, to review 2201 the space needs of each agency, and to review the length and 2202 terms of potential renewals or renegotiations. The department 2203 shall provide a report to the Executive Office of the Governor, 2204 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 2205 Representatives by November 1, 2026, which lists each lease 2206 contract for private office or storage space, the status of 2207 renegotiations, and the savings achieved. This section expires 2208 July 1, 2027. 2209 Section 54.âIn order to implement appropriations authorized 2210 in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for data center 2211 services, and notwithstanding s. 216.292(2)(a), Florida 2212 Statutes, an agency may not transfer funds from a data 2213 processing category to a category other than another data 2214 processing category or a cloud computing category for 2215 information technology resources hosted outside an agency. This 2216 section expires July 1, 2027. 2217 Section 55.âIn order to implement the appropriation of 2218 funds in the appropriation category âSpecial Categories-Risk 2219 Management Insuranceâ in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations 2220 Act, and pursuant to the notice, review, and objection 2221 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, the Executive Office 2222 of the Governor may transfer funds appropriated in that category 2223 between departments in order to align the budget authority 2224 granted with the premiums paid by each department for risk 2225 management insurance. This section expires July 1, 2027. 2226 Section 56.âIn order to implement the appropriation of 2227 funds in the appropriation category âSpecial Categories-Transfer 2228 to Department of Management Services-Human Resources Services 2229 Purchased per Statewide Contractâ in the 2026-2027 General 2230 Appropriations Act, and pursuant to the notice, review, and 2231 objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, the 2232 Executive Office of the Governor may transfer funds appropriated 2233 in that category between departments in order to align the 2234 budget authority granted with the assessments that must be paid 2235 by each agency to the Department of Management Services for 2236 human resource management services. This section expires July 1, 2237 2027. 2238 Section 57.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2239 2935 in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act in the Building 2240 Relocation appropriation category from the Architects Incidental 2241 Trust Fund of the Department of Management Services, and in 2242 accordance with s. 215.196, Florida Statutes: 2243 (1)âUpon the final disposition of a state-owned building, 2244 the Department of Management Services may use up to 5 percent of 2245 facility disposition funds from the Architects Incidental Trust 2246 Fund to defer, offset, or otherwise pay for all or a portion of 2247 relocation expenses, including furniture, fixtures, and 2248 equipment for state agencies impacted by the disposition of the 2249 departmentâs managed facilities in the Florida Facilities Pool. 2250 The extent of the financial assistance provided to impacted 2251 state agencies shall be determined by the department. 2252 (2)âThe Department of Management Services may submit budget 2253 amendments for an increase in appropriation if necessary for the 2254 implementation of this section pursuant to chapter 216, Florida 2255 Statutes. Budget amendments for an increase in appropriation 2256 shall include a detailed plan providing all estimated costs and 2257 relocation proposals. 2258 (3)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 2259 Section 58.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 2260 2513 through 2516 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act: 2261 (1)âThe Department of Financial Services shall replace the 2262 four main components of the Florida Accounting Information 2263 Resource Subsystem (FLAIR), which include central FLAIR, 2264 departmental FLAIR, payroll, and information warehouse, and 2265 shall replace the cash management and accounting management 2266 components of the Cash Management Subsystem (CMS) with an 2267 integrated enterprise system that allows the state to organize, 2268 define, and standardize its financial management business 2269 processes and that complies with ss. 215.90-215.96, Florida 2270 Statutes. The department may not include in the replacement of 2271 FLAIR and CMS: 2272 (a)âFunctionality that duplicates any of the other 2273 information subsystems of the Florida Financial Management 2274 Information System; or 2275 (b)âAgency business processes related to any of the 2276 functions included in the Personnel Information System, the 2277 Purchasing Subsystem, or the Legislative Appropriations 2278 System/Planning and Budgeting Subsystem. 2279 (2)âFor purposes of replacing FLAIR and CMS, the Department 2280 of Financial Services shall: 2281 (a)âTake into consideration the cost and implementation 2282 data identified for Option 3 as recommended in the March 31, 2283 2014, Florida Department of Financial Services FLAIR Study, 2284 version 031. 2285 (b)âEnsure that all business requirements and technical 2286 specifications have been provided to all state agencies for 2287 their review and input and approved by the executive steering 2288 committee established in paragraph (c), including any updates to 2289 these documents. 2290 (c)âImplement a project governance structure that includes 2291 an executive steering committee composed of: 2292 1.âThe Chief Financial Officer or the executive sponsor of 2293 the project. 2294 2.âA representative of the Division of Treasury of the 2295 Department of Financial Services, appointed by the Chief 2296 Financial Officer. 2297 3.âThe Chief Information Officers of the Department of 2298 Financial Services and the Department of Environmental 2299 Protection. 2300 4.âTwo employees from the Division of Accounting and 2301 Auditing of the Department of Financial Services, appointed by 2302 the Chief Financial Officer. Each employee must have experience 2303 relating to at least one of the four main components that 2304 compose FLAIR. 2305 5.âTwo employees from the Executive Office of the Governor, 2306 appointed by the Governor. One employee must have experience 2307 relating to the Legislative Appropriations System/Planning and 2308 Budgeting Subsystem. 2309 6.âOne employee from the Department of Revenue, appointed 2310 by the executive director, who has experience using or 2311 maintaining the departmentâs finance and accounting systems. 2312 7.âTwo employees from the Department of Management 2313 Services, appointed by the Secretary of Management Services. One 2314 employee must have experience relating to the departmentâs 2315 personnel information subsystem and one employee must have 2316 experience relating to the departmentâs purchasing subsystem. 2317 8.âA state agency administrative services director, 2318 appointed by the Governor. 2319 9.âThe executive sponsor of the Florida Health Care 2320 Connection (FX) System or his or her designee, appointed by the 2321 Secretary of Health Care Administration. 2322 10.âThe state chief information officer, or his or her 2323 designee, as a nonvoting member. The state chief information 2324 officer, or his or her designee, shall provide monthly status 2325 reports to the executive steering committee pursuant to the 2326 oversight responsibilities in s. 282.0051, Florida Statutes. 2327 11.âOne employee from the Department of Business and 2328 Professional Regulation who has experience in finance and 2329 accounting and FLAIR, appointed by the Secretary of Business and 2330 Professional Regulation. 2331 12.âOne employee from the Fish and Wildlife Conservation 2332 Commission who has experience using or maintaining the 2333 commissionâs finance and accounting systems, appointed by the 2334 chair of the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission. 2335 13.âThe budget director of the Department of Education, or 2336 his or her designee. 2337 (3)(a)âThe Chief Financial Officer or the executive sponsor 2338 of the project shall serve as chair of the executive steering 2339 committee, and the committee shall take action by a vote of at 2340 least eight affirmative votes with the Chief Financial Officer 2341 or the executive sponsor of the project voting on the prevailing 2342 side. A quorum of the executive steering committee consists of 2343 at least 10 members. 2344 (b)âNo later than 14 days before a meeting of the executive 2345 steering committee, the chair shall request input from committee 2346 members on agenda items for the next scheduled meeting. 2347 (c)âThe chair shall establish a working group composed of 2348 FLAIR users, state agency technical staff who maintain 2349 applications that integrate with FLAIR, and no less than four 2350 state agency finance and accounting or budget directors. The 2351 working group shall meet at least monthly to review PALM 2352 functionality, assess project impacts to state financial 2353 business processes and agency staff, and develop recommendations 2354 to the executive steering committee for improvements. The chair 2355 shall request input from the working group on agenda items for 2356 each scheduled meeting. The Florida PALM project team shall 2357 dedicate a staff member to the group and provide system 2358 demonstrations and any project documentation, as needed, for the 2359 group to fulfill its duties. 2360 (d)âThe chair shall request all agency project sponsors to 2361 provide bimonthly status reports to the executive steering 2362 committee. The form and format of the bimonthly status reports 2363 shall be developed by the Florida PALM project and provided to 2364 the executive steering committee meeting for approval. Such 2365 agency status reports shall provide information to the executive 2366 steering committee on the activities and ongoing work within the 2367 agency to prepare its systems and impacted employees for the 2368 deployment of the Florida PALM System. The first bimonthly 2369 status report is due September 1, 2026, and bimonthly 2370 thereafter. 2371 (4)âThe executive steering committee has the overall 2372 responsibility for ensuring that the project to replace FLAIR 2373 and CMS meets its primary business objectives and shall: 2374 (a)âIdentify and recommend to the Executive Office of the 2375 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 2376 House of Representatives any statutory changes needed to 2377 implement the replacement subsystem that will standardize, to 2378 the fullest extent possible, the stateâs financial management 2379 business processes. 2380 (b)âReview and approve any changes to the projectâs scope, 2381 schedule, and budget which do not conflict with the requirements 2382 of subsection (1). 2383 (c)âEnsure that adequate resources are provided throughout 2384 all phases of the project. 2385 (d)âApprove all major project deliverables and any cost 2386 changes to each deliverable over $250,000. 2387 (e)âApprove contract amendments and changes to all 2388 contract-related documents associated with the replacement of 2389 FLAIR and CMS. 2390 (f)âReview, and approve as warranted, the format of the 2391 bimonthly agency status reports to include objective and 2392 quantifiable information on each agencyâs progress in planning 2393 for the Florida PALM Major Implementation, covering the agencyâs 2394 people, processes, technology, and data transformation 2395 activities. 2396 (g)âEnsure compliance with ss. 216.181(16), 216.311, 2397 216.313, 282.318(4)(h), and 287.058, Florida Statutes. 2398 (5)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 2399 Section 59.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2400 3040 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 2401 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 65 of chapter 2402 2025-199, Laws of Florida, subsection (3) of section 282.709, 2403 Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2404 282.709âState agency law enforcement radio system and 2405 interoperability network.â 2406 (3)âIn recognition of the critical nature of the statewide 2407 law enforcement radio communications system, the Legislature 2408 finds that there is an immediate danger to the public health, 2409 safety, and welfare, and that it is in the best interest of the 2410 state to continue partnering with the systemâs current operator. 2411 The Legislature finds that continuity of coverage is critical to 2412 supporting law enforcement, first responders, and other public 2413 safety users. The potential for a loss in coverage or a lack of 2414 interoperability between users requires emergency action and is 2415 a serious concern for officersâ safety and their ability to 2416 communicate and respond to various disasters and events. 2417 (a)âThe department, pursuant to s. 287.057(11), shall enter 2418 into a 15-year contract with the entity that was operating the 2419 statewide radio communications system on January 1, 2021. The 2420 contract must include: 2421 1.âThe purchase of radios; 2422 2.âThe upgrade to the Project 25 communications standard; 2423 3.âIncreased system capacity and enhanced coverage for 2424 system users; 2425 4.âOperations, maintenance, and support at a fixed annual 2426 rate; 2427 5.âThe conveyance of communications towers to the 2428 department; and 2429 6.âThe assignment of communications tower leases to the 2430 department. 2431 (b)âThe State Agency Law Enforcement Radio System Trust 2432 Fund is established in the department and funded from surcharges 2433 collected under ss. 318.18, 320.0802, and 328.72. Upon 2434 appropriation, moneys in the trust fund may be used by the 2435 department to acquire the equipment, software, and engineering, 2436 administrative, and maintenance services it needs to construct, 2437 operate, and maintain the statewide radio system. Moneys in the 2438 trust fund from surcharges shall be used to help fund the costs 2439 of the system. Upon completion of the system, moneys in the 2440 trust fund may also be used by the department for payment of the 2441 recurring maintenance costs of the system. 2442 Section 60.âThe text of s. 282.709(3), Florida Statutes, as 2443 carried forward from chapter 2021-37, Laws of Florida, by this 2444 act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that subsection shall 2445 revert to that in existence on June 1, 2021, except that any 2446 amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall be 2447 preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such 2448 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which 2449 expire pursuant to this section. 2450 Section 61.âIn order to implement appropriations relating 2451 to the purchase of equipment and services related to the 2452 Statewide Law Enforcement Radio System (SLERS) as authorized in 2453 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding s. 2454 287.057, Florida Statutes, state agencies and other eligible 2455 users of the SLERS network may use the Department of Management 2456 Services SLERS contract for purchase of equipment and services. 2457 This section expires July 1, 2027. 2458 Section 62.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 2459 2954 through 2965 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 2460 and notwithstanding rule 60A-1.031, Florida Administrative Code, 2461 the transaction fee as identified in s. 287.057(24)(c), Florida 2462 Statutes, shall be collected for use of the online procurement 2463 system and is 0.7 percent for the 2026-2027 fiscal year only. 2464 This section expires July 1, 2027. 2465 Section 63.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 2466 2866 through 2892 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 2467 and upon the expiration and reversion of the amendments made by 2468 section 69 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, paragraph (i) 2469 of subsection (9) of section 24.105, Florida Statutes, is 2470 amended to read: 2471 24.105âPowers and duties of department.âThe department 2472 shall: 2473 (9)âAdopt rules governing the establishment and operation 2474 of the state lottery, including: 2475 (i)âThe manner and amount of compensation of retailers, 2476 except for the 2026-2027 fiscal year only, effective July 1, 2477 2026, the commission for lottery ticket sales shall be 6 percent 2478 of the purchase price of each ticket sold or issued as a prize 2479 by a retailer. Any additional retailer compensation is limited 2480 to the Florida Lottery Retailer Bonus Commission program 2481 appropriated in Specific Appropriation 2892 of the 2026-2027 2482 General Appropriations Act. 2483 Section 64.âThe amendment to s. 24.105(9)(i), Florida 2484 Statutes, made by this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of 2485 that paragraph shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2486 2022, except that any amendments to such text enacted other than 2487 by this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the 2488 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions 2489 of text which expire pursuant to this section. 2490 Section 65.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 2491 3084 through 3092 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 2492 paragraph (ll) of subsection (6) of section 627.351, Florida 2493 Statutes, is amended to read: 2494 627.351âInsurance risk apportionment plans.â 2495 (6)âCITIZENS PROPERTY INSURANCE CORPORATION.â 2496 (ll)1.âIn addition to any other method of alternative 2497 dispute resolution authorized by state law, the corporation may 2498 adopt policy forms that provide for the resolution of disputes 2499 regarding its claim determinations, including disputes regarding 2500 coverage for, or the scope and value of, a claim, in a 2501 proceeding before the Division of Administrative Hearings. Any 2502 such policies are not subject to s. 627.70154. All proceedings 2503 in the Division of Administrative Hearings pursuant to such 2504 policies are subject to ss. 57.105 and 768.79 as if filed in the 2505 courts of this state and are not considered chapter 120 2506 administrative proceedings. Rule 1.442, Florida Rules of Civil 2507 Procedure, applies to any offer served pursuant to s. 768.79, 2508 except that, notwithstanding any provision in Rule 1.442, 2509 Florida Rules of Civil Procedure, to the contrary, an offer 2510 shall not be served earlier than 10 days after filing the 2511 request for hearing with the Division of Administrative Hearings 2512 and shall not be served later than 10 days before the date set 2513 for the final hearing. The administrative law judge in such 2514 proceedings shall award attorney fees and other relief pursuant 2515 to ss. 57.105 and 768.79. The corporation may not seek, and the 2516 office may not approve, a maximum hourly rate for attorney fees. 2517 2.âThe corporation may contract with the division to 2518 conduct proceedings to resolve disputes regarding its claim 2519 determinations as may be provided for in the applicable policies 2520 of insurance. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026. 2521 Section 66.âIn order to implement section 125 of the 2026 2522 2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) 2523 of section 215.5586, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2524 215.5586âMy Safe Florida Home Program.âThere is established 2525 within the Department of Financial Services the My Safe Florida 2526 Home Program. The department shall provide fiscal 2527 accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership 2528 for the program, consistent with this section. This section does 2529 not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the 2530 state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of 2531 residential property in this state. Implementation of this 2532 program is subject to annual legislative appropriations. It is 2533 the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the availability 2534 of funds, the My Safe Florida Home Program provide licensed 2535 inspectors to perform hurricane mitigation inspections of 2536 eligible homes and grants to fund hurricane mitigation projects 2537 on those homes. The department shall implement the program in 2538 such a manner that the total amount of funding requested by 2539 accepted applications, whether for inspections, grants, or other 2540 services or assistance, does not exceed the total amount of 2541 available funds. If, after applications are processed and 2542 approved, funds remain available, the department may accept 2543 applications up to the available amount. The program shall 2544 develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach 2545 for hurricane damage mitigation pursuant to the requirements 2546 provided in this section. 2547 (2)âHURRICANE MITIGATION GRANTS.âFinancial grants shall be 2548 used by homeowners to make improvements recommended by an 2549 inspection which increase resistance to hurricane damage. 2550 (a)âA homeowner is eligible for a hurricane mitigation 2551 grant if all of the following criteria are met: 2552 1.âThe home must be eligible for an inspection under 2553 subsection (1). 2554 2.âThe home must be a dwelling with an insured value of 2555 $700,000 or less. Homeowners who are low-income persons, as 2556 defined in s. 420.0004(11), are exempt from this requirement. 2557 3.âThe home must undergo an acceptable hurricane mitigation 2558 inspection as provided in subsection (1). 2559 4.âThe building permit application for initial construction 2560 of the home must have been made before January 1, 2008. 2561 5.âThe homeowner must agree to make his or her home 2562 available for inspection once a mitigation project is completed. 2563 6.âThe homeowner must agree to provide to the department 2564 information received from the homeownerâs insurer identifying 2565 the discounts realized by the homeowner because of the 2566 mitigation improvements funded through the program. 2567 7.a.âThe homeowner must be a low-income person or moderate 2568 income person as defined in s. 420.0004. 2569 b.âThe hurricane mitigation inspection must have occurred 2570 within the previous 24 months from the date of application. 2571 c.âNotwithstanding subparagraph 2., homeowners who are low 2572 income persons, as defined in s. 420.0004(11), are not exempt 2573 from the requirement that the home must be a dwelling with an 2574 insured value of $700,000 or less. 2575 d.âThis subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026. 2576 Section 67.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, in 2577 order to implement Specific Appropriation 2544A of the 2026-2027 2578 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding s. 216.301, 2579 Florida Statutes, the funds appropriated to the Department of 2580 Financial Services in Specific Appropriation 2245A and section 2581 74 of the 2025-2026 General Appropriations Act will not revert 2582 and may be carried forward through the 2026-2027 fiscal year. 2583 This section expires July 1, 2027. 2584 Section 68.âIn order to implement the appropriation of 2585 funds in the appropriation category âNorthwest Regional Data 2586 Centerâ in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 2587 pursuant to the notice, review, and objection procedures of s. 2588 216.177, Florida Statutes, the Executive Office of the Governor 2589 may transfer funds appropriated in that category between 2590 departments in order to align the budget authority granted based 2591 on the estimated costs for data processing services for the 2592 2026-2027 fiscal year. This section expires July 1, 2027. 2593 Section 69.âIn order to implement appropriations authorized 2594 in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for state data 2595 center services, auxiliary assessments charged to state agencies 2596 related to contract management services provided to Northwest 2597 Regional Data Center may not exceed 3 percent. This section 2598 expires July 1, 2027. 2599 Section 70.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2600 2563A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, section 2601 284.51, Florida Statutes, is reenacted and amended to read: 2602 284.51âElectroencephalogram combined transcranial magnetic 2603 stimulation treatment pilot program.â 2604 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 2605 (a)ââDivisionâ means the Division of Risk Management of the 2606 Department of Financial Services. 2607 (b)ââElectroencephalogram combined Transcranial Magnetic 2608 Stimulationâ or âeTMSâ means treatment in which transcranial 2609 magnetic stimulation frequency pulses are tuned to the patientâs 2610 physiology and biometric data. 2611 (c)ââFirst responderâ means a law enforcement officer, a 2612 part-time law enforcement officer, or an auxiliary law 2613 enforcement officer as defined in s. 943.10; a firefighter as 2614 defined in s. 633.102; a 911 public safety telecommunicator as 2615 defined in s. 401.465; or an emergency medical technician or 2616 paramedic as defined in s. 401.23 employed by state or local 2617 government. The term also includes a volunteer or retired law 2618 enforcement officer, firefighter, or emergency medical 2619 technician or paramedic engaged, or previously engaged, by the 2620 state or a local government. 2621 (d)ââVeteranâ means: 2622 1.âA veteran as defined in 38 U.S.C. s. 101(2); 2623 2.âA person who served in a reserve component as defined in 2624 38 U.S.C. s. 101(27); or 2625 3.âA person who served in the National Guard of any state. 2626 (2)âThe division shall select a provider to establish a 2627 statewide pilot program to make eTMS available for veterans, 2628 first responders, and immediate family members of veterans and 2629 first responders with: 2630 (a)âSubstance use disorders. 2631 (b)âMental illness. 2632 (c)âSleep disorders. 2633 (d)âTraumatic brain injuries. 2634 (e)âSexual trauma. 2635 (f)âPosttraumatic stress disorder and accompanying 2636 comorbidities. 2637 (g)âConcussions. 2638 (h)âOther brain trauma. 2639 (i)âQuality of life issues affecting human performance, 2640 including issues related to or resulting from problems with 2641 cognition and problems maintaining attention, concentration, or 2642 focus. 2643 (3)âThe provider must display a history of serving veteran 2644 and first responder populations at a statewide level. The 2645 provider shall establish a network for in-person and offsite 2646 care with the goal of providing statewide access. Consideration 2647 shall be provided to locations with a large population of first 2648 responders and veterans. In addition to traditional eTMS 2649 devices, the provider may utilize nonmedical Portable Magnetic 2650 Stimulation devices to improve access to underserved populations 2651 in remote areas or to be used to serve as a pre-post treatment 2652 or a stand-alone device. The provider shall be required to 2653 establish and operate a clinical practice and to evaluate 2654 outcomes of such clinical practice. 2655 (4)âThe pilot program shall include: 2656 (a)âThe establishment of a peer-to-peer support network by 2657 the provider made available to all individuals receiving 2658 treatment under the program. 2659 (b)âThe requirement that each individual who receives 2660 treatment under the program also must receive neurophysiological 2661 monitoring, monitoring for symptoms of substance use and other 2662 mental health disorders, and access to counseling and wellness 2663 programming. Each individual who receives treatment must also 2664 participate in the peer-to-peer support network established by 2665 the provider. 2666 (c)âThe establishment of protocols which include the use of 2667 adopted stimulation frequency and intensity modulation based on 2668 EEGs done on days 0, 10, and 20 and motor threshold testing, as 2669 well as clinical symptoms, signs, and biometrics. 2670 (d)âThe requirement that protocols and outcomes of any 2671 treatment provided by the clinical practice shall be collected 2672 and reported by the provider quarterly to the division, the 2673 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 2674 Representatives. Such report shall include the biodata metrics 2675 and all expenditures and accounting of the use of funds received 2676 from the department. 2677 (e)âThe requirement that protocols and outcomes of any 2678 treatment provided by the clinical practice shall be collected 2679 and reported to the University of South Florida and may be 2680 provided by the provider to any relevant Food and Drug 2681 Administration studies or trials. 2682 (5)âThe division may adopt rules to implement this section. 2683 (6)âThis section expires July 1, 2027 2026. 2684 Section 71.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2685 2563A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the 2686 Department of Financial Services shall continue its existing 2687 contract for the establishment of the Electroencephalogram 2688 Combined Transcranial Magnetic Stimulation Treatment pilot 2689 program for veterans and first responders. The departmentâs 2690 existing contract, and all funds paid by the department pursuant 2691 to that contract, do not constitute state financial assistance 2692 as provided in s. 215.97, Florida Statutes. This section expires 2693 July 1, 2027. 2694 Section 72.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, and in 2695 order to implement Specific Appropriations 2505 through 2512 of 2696 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (3) is 2697 added to section 717.123, Florida Statutes, to read: 2698 717.123âDeposit of funds.â 2699 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (1), and for the 2025-2026 2700 and 2026-2027 fiscal years, the department shall retain, from 2701 the funds received under this chapter, an amount not to exceed 2702 the amount estimated to be received as atypical receipts for the 2703 2024-2025 and 2025-2026 fiscal years by the Revenue Estimating 2704 Conference resulting from the implementation of chapter 2024 2705 140, Laws of Florida. This amount must be held in a separate 2706 account and is in addition to the $15 million the department is 2707 authorized to retain pursuant to subsection (1). From the 2708 separate account the department shall make prompt payment of 2709 claims relating to the atypical receipts allowed by the 2710 department. This subsection expires July 1, 2027. 2711 Section 73.âIn order to implement specific appropriations 2712 from the land acquisition trust funds within the Department of 2713 Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Department of 2714 Environmental Protection, the Department of State, and the Fish 2715 and Wildlife Conservation Commission, which are contained in the 2716 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (3) of section 2717 215.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2718 215.18âTransfers between funds; limitation.â 2719 (3)âNotwithstanding subsection (1) and only with respect to 2720 a land acquisition trust fund in the Department of Agriculture 2721 and Consumer Services, the Department of Environmental 2722 Protection, the Department of State, or the Fish and Wildlife 2723 Conservation Commission, whenever there is a deficiency in a 2724 land acquisition trust fund which would render that trust fund 2725 temporarily insufficient to meet its just requirements, 2726 including the timely payment of appropriations from that trust 2727 fund, and other trust funds in the State Treasury have moneys 2728 that are for the time being or otherwise in excess of the 2729 amounts necessary to meet the just requirements, including 2730 appropriated obligations, of those other trust funds, the 2731 Governor may order a temporary transfer of moneys from one or 2732 more of the other trust funds to a land acquisition trust fund 2733 in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the 2734 Department of Environmental Protection, the Department of State, 2735 or the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission. Any action 2736 proposed pursuant to this subsection is subject to the notice, 2737 review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, and the Governor 2738 shall provide notice of such action at least 7 days before the 2739 effective date of the transfer of trust funds, except that 2740 during July 2026 2025, notice of such action shall be provided 2741 at least 3 days before the effective date of a transfer unless 2742 such 3-day notice is waived by the chair and vice chair of the 2743 Legislative Budget Commission. Any transfer of trust funds to a 2744 land acquisition trust fund in the Department of Agriculture and 2745 Consumer Services, the Department of Environmental Protection, 2746 the Department of State, or the Fish and Wildlife Conservation 2747 Commission must be repaid to the trust funds from which the 2748 moneys were loaned by the end of the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal 2749 year. The Legislature has determined that the repayment of the 2750 other trust fund moneys temporarily loaned to a land acquisition 2751 trust fund in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 2752 Services, the Department of Environmental Protection, the 2753 Department of State, or the Fish and Wildlife Conservation 2754 Commission pursuant to this subsection is an allowable use of 2755 the moneys in a land acquisition trust fund because the moneys 2756 from other trust funds temporarily loaned to a land acquisition 2757 trust fund shall be expended solely and exclusively in 2758 accordance with s. 28, Art. X of the State Constitution. This 2759 subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026. 2760 Section 74.â(1)âIn order to implement specific 2761 appropriations from the land acquisition trust funds within the 2762 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the Department 2763 of Environmental Protection, the Department of State, and the 2764 Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission which are contained in 2765 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, the Department of 2766 Environmental Protection shall transfer revenues from the Land 2767 Acquisition Trust Fund within the department to the land 2768 acquisition trust funds within the Department of Agriculture and 2769 Consumer Services, the Department of State, and the Fish and 2770 Wildlife Conservation Commission as provided in this section. As 2771 used in this section, the term âdepartmentâ means the Department 2772 of Environmental Protection. 2773 (2)âAfter subtracting any required debt service payments, 2774 the proportionate share of revenues to be transferred to each 2775 land acquisition trust fund shall be calculated by dividing the 2776 appropriations from each of the land acquisition trust funds for 2777 the fiscal year by the total appropriations from the Land 2778 Acquisition Trust Fund within the department and the land 2779 acquisition trust funds within the Department of Agriculture and 2780 Consumer Services, the Department of State, and the Fish and 2781 Wildlife Conservation Commission for the fiscal year. The 2782 department shall transfer the proportionate share of the 2783 revenues in the Land Acquisition Trust Fund within the 2784 department on a monthly basis to the appropriate land 2785 acquisition trust funds within the Department of Agriculture and 2786 Consumer Services, the Department of State, and the Fish and 2787 Wildlife Conservation Commission and shall retain its 2788 proportionate share of the revenues in the Land Acquisition 2789 Trust Fund within the department. Total distributions to a land 2790 acquisition trust fund within the Department of Agriculture and 2791 Consumer Services, the Department of State, and the Fish and 2792 Wildlife Conservation Commission may not exceed the total 2793 appropriations from such trust fund for the fiscal year. 2794 (3)âIn addition, the department shall transfer from the 2795 Land Acquisition Trust Fund to land acquisition trust funds 2796 within the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services, the 2797 Department of State, and the Fish and Wildlife Conservation 2798 Commission amounts equal to the difference between the amounts 2799 appropriated in chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida, to the 2800 departmentâs Land Acquisition Trust Fund and the other land 2801 acquisition trust funds, and the amounts actually transferred 2802 between those trust funds during the 2025-2026 fiscal year. 2803 (4)âThe department may advance funds from the beginning 2804 unobligated fund balance in the Land Acquisition Trust Fund to 2805 the Land Acquisition Trust Fund within the Fish and Wildlife 2806 Conservation Commission needed for cash flow purposes based on a 2807 detailed expenditure plan. The department shall prorate amounts 2808 transferred quarterly to the Fish and Wildlife Conservation 2809 Commission to recoup the amount of funds advanced by June 30, 2810 2027. 2811 (5)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 2812 Section 75.âIn order to implement specific appropriations 2813 from the Florida Forever Trust Fund within the Department of 2814 Environmental Protection, which are contained in the 2026-2027 2815 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (m) of subsection (3) of 2816 section 259.105, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2817 259.105âThe Florida Forever Act.â 2818 (3)âLess the costs of issuing and the costs of funding 2819 reserve accounts and other costs associated with bonds, the 2820 proceeds of cash payments or bonds issued pursuant to this 2821 section shall be deposited into the Florida Forever Trust Fund 2822 created by s. 259.1051. The proceeds shall be distributed by the 2823 Department of Environmental Protection in the following manner: 2824 (m)âNotwithstanding paragraphs (a)-(j) and for the 2026 2825 2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, the proceeds shall be distributed as 2826 provided in the General Appropriations Act. This paragraph 2827 expires July 1, 2027 2026. 2828 Section 76.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2829 1776 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 2830 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 85 of chapter 2831 2025-199, Laws of Florida, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of 2832 section 376.91, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 2833 376.91âStatewide cleanup of perfluoroalkyl and 2834 polyfluoroalkyl substances.â 2835 (2)âSTATEWIDE CLEANUP TARGET LEVELS.â 2836 (a)âIf the United States Environmental Protection Agency 2837 has not finalized its standards for PFAS in drinking water, 2838 groundwater, and soil by January 1, 2027 2026, the department 2839 shall adopt by rule statewide cleanup target levels for PFAS in 2840 drinking water, groundwater, and soil using criteria set forth 2841 in s. 376.30701, with priority given to PFOA and PFOS. The rules 2842 for statewide cleanup target levels may not take effect until 2843 ratified by the Legislature. 2844 Section 77.âThe amendment to s. 376.91(2)(a), Florida 2845 Statutes, made by this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of 2846 that paragraph shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2847 2025, except that any amendments to such text enacted other than 2848 by this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the 2849 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions 2850 of text which expire pursuant to this section. 2851 Section 78.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2852 1831A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 2853 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 89 of chapter 2854 2025-199, Laws of Florida, paragraph (g) of subsection (15) of 2855 section 376.3071, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 2856 376.3071âInland Protection Trust Fund; creation; purposes; 2857 funding.â 2858 (15)âETHANOL OR BIODIESEL DAMAGE; PREVENTIVE MEASURES.âThe 2859 department shall pay, pursuant to this subsection, up to $10 2860 million each fiscal year from the fund for the costs of labor 2861 and equipment to repair or replace petroleum storage systems 2862 that may have been damaged due to the storage of fuels blended 2863 with ethanol or biodiesel, or for preventive measures to reduce 2864 the potential for such damage. 2865 (g)âPayments may not be made for the following: 2866 1.âProposal costs or costs related to preparation of the 2867 application and required documentation; 2868 2.âCertified public accountant costs; 2869 3.âExcept as provided in paragraph (j), any costs in excess 2870 of the amount approved by the department under paragraph (b) or 2871 which are not in substantial compliance with the purchase order; 2872 4.âCosts associated with storage tanks, piping, or 2873 ancillary equipment that has previously been repaired or 2874 replaced for which costs have been paid under this section; 2875 5.âFacilities that are not in compliance with department 2876 storage tank rules, until the noncompliance issues have been 2877 resolved; or 2878 6.âCosts associated with damage to petroleum storage 2879 systems caused in whole or in part by causes other than the 2880 storage of fuels blended with ethanol or biodiesel. 2881 Section 79.âThe text of s. 376.3071(15)(g), Florida 2882 Statutes, as carried forward from chapter 2020-114, Laws of 2883 Florida, by this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that 2884 paragraph shall revert to that in existence on July 1, 2020, but 2885 not including any amendments made by this act or chapter 2020 2886 114, Laws of Florida, and any amendments to such text enacted 2887 other than by this act shall be preserved and continue to 2888 operate to the extent that such amendments are not dependent 2889 upon the portion of text which expires pursuant to this section. 2890 Section 80.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2891 2320 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 2892 notwithstanding chapter 287, Florida Statutes, the Department of 2893 Citrus shall enter into agreements for the purpose of increasing 2894 production of trees that show tolerance or resistance to citrus 2895 greening and to commercialize technologies that produce 2896 tolerance or resistance to citrus greening in trees. The 2897 department shall enter into these agreements no later than 2898 January 1, 2027, and shall file with the departmentâs Inspector 2899 General a certification of conditions and circumstances 2900 justifying each agreement entered into without competitive 2901 solicitation. This section expires July 1, 2027. 2902 Section 81.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2903 1715 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 2904 notwithstanding the expiration date in section 92 of chapter 2905 2025-199, Laws of Florida, section 380.5105, Florida Statutes, 2906 as amended by chapters 2024-228 and 2025-199, Laws of Florida, 2907 is reenacted to read: 2908 380.5105âThe Stan Mayfield Working Waterfronts; Florida 2909 Forever program.â 2910 (1)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it 2911 is the intent of the Legislature that the trust shall administer 2912 the working waterfronts land acquisition program as set forth in 2913 this section. 2914 (a)âThe trust and the Department of Agriculture and 2915 Consumer Services shall jointly develop rules specifically 2916 establishing an application process and a process for the 2917 evaluation, scoring and ranking of working waterfront projects. 2918 The proposed rules jointly developed pursuant to this paragraph 2919 shall be promulgated by the trust. Such rules shall establish a 2920 system of weighted criteria to give increased priority to 2921 projects: 2922 1.âWithin a municipality with a population less than 2923 30,000; 2924 2.âWithin a municipality or area under intense growth and 2925 development pressures, as evidenced by a number of factors, 2926 including a determination that the municipalityâs growth rate 2927 exceeds the average growth rate for the state; 2928 3.âWithin the boundary of a community redevelopment agency 2929 established pursuant to s. 163.356; 2930 4.âAdjacent to state-owned submerged lands designated as an 2931 aquatic preserve identified in s. 258.39; or 2932 5.âThat provide a demonstrable benefit to the local 2933 economy. 2934 (b)âFor projects that will require more than the grant 2935 amount awarded for completion, the applicant must identify in 2936 their project application funding sources that will provide the 2937 difference between the grant award and the estimated project 2938 completion cost. Such rules may be incorporated into those 2939 developed pursuant to s. 380.507(11). 2940 (c)âThe trust shall develop a ranking list based on 2941 criteria identified in paragraph (a) for proposed fee simple and 2942 less-than-fee simple acquisition projects developed pursuant to 2943 this section. The trust shall, by the first Board of Trustees of 2944 the Internal Improvement Trust Fund meeting in February, present 2945 the ranking list pursuant to this section to the board of 2946 trustees for final approval of projects for funding. The board 2947 of trustees may remove projects from the ranking list but may 2948 not add projects. 2949 (d)âGrant awards, acquisition approvals, and terms of less 2950 than-fee acquisitions shall be approved by the trust. Waterfront 2951 communities that receive grant awards must submit annual 2952 progress reports to the trust identifying project activities 2953 which are complete, and the progress achieved in meeting the 2954 goals outlined in the project application. The trust must 2955 implement a process to monitor and evaluate the performance of 2956 grant recipients in completing projects that are funded through 2957 the working waterfronts program. 2958 (2)âNotwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, it 2959 is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of 2960 Environmental Protection shall administer the working 2961 waterfronts capital outlay grant program as set forth in this 2962 section to support the commercial fishing and marine aquaculture 2963 industries, including the infrastructure for receiving or 2964 unloading seafood for the purpose of supporting the seafood 2965 economy. 2966 (a)âThe working waterfronts capital outlay grant program is 2967 created to provide funding to assist commercial saltwater 2968 products or commercial saltwater wholesale dealer or retailer 2969 license holders and seafood houses in maintaining their 2970 operations. 2971 (b)âEligible costs and expenditures include fixed capital 2972 outlay and operating capital outlay, including, but not limited 2973 to, the repair and maintenance or replacement of equipment, the 2974 repair and maintenance or replacement of water-adjacent 2975 facilities or infrastructure, and the construction or renovation 2976 of shoreside facilities. 2977 (c)âThe applicant must demonstrate a benefit to the local 2978 economy. 2979 (d)âGrant recipients must submit annual progress reports to 2980 the department identifying project activities that are complete 2981 and the progress achieved in meeting the goals outlined in the 2982 project application. 2983 (e)âThe department shall implement a process to monitor and 2984 evaluate the performance of grant recipients in completing 2985 projects funded through the program. 2986 Section 82.âThe text of s. 380.5105, Florida Statutes, as 2987 carried forward from chapters 2024-228 and 2025-199, Laws of 2988 Florida, by this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that 2989 section shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2024, 2990 except that any amendments to such text enacted other than by 2991 this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the 2992 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions 2993 of text which expire pursuant to this section. 2994 Section 83.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 2995 1951 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act and 2996 notwithstanding s. 823.11(4)(c), Florida Statutes, the Fish and 2997 Wildlife Conservation Commission may use funds appropriated for 2998 the derelict vessel removal program for grants to local 2999 governments or to remove, store, destroy, and dispose of, or to 3000 pay private contractors to remove, store, destroy, and dispose 3001 of, derelict vessels or vessels declared a public nuisance 3002 pursuant to s. 327.73(1)(aa), Florida Statutes. This section 3003 expires July 1, 2027. 3004 Section 84.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3005 1744A of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection 3006 (4) is added to section 403.890, Florida Statutes, to read: 3007 403.890âWater Protection and Sustainability Program.â 3008 (4)âNotwithstanding subsections (1) and (2), revenues 3009 deposited into or appropriated to the Water Protection and 3010 Sustainability Program Trust Fund may be used as provided in the 3011 General Appropriations Act. This subsection expires July 1, 3012 2027. 3013 Section 85.âIn order to implement appropriations from the 3014 Land Acquisition Trust Fund within the Department of 3015 Environmental Protection in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations 3016 Act, paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 375.041, Florida 3017 Statutes, is amended to read: 3018 375.041âLand Acquisition Trust Fund.â 3019 (3)âFunds distributed into the Land Acquisition Trust Fund 3020 pursuant to s. 201.15 shall be applied: 3021 (b)âOf the funds remaining after the payments required 3022 under paragraph (a), but before funds may be appropriated, 3023 pledged, or dedicated for other uses: 3024 1.âA minimum of the lesser of 25 percent or $200 million 3025 shall be appropriated annually for Everglades projects that 3026 implement the Comprehensive Everglades Restoration Plan as set 3027 forth in s. 373.470, including the Central Everglades Planning 3028 Project subject to congressional authorization; the Long-Term 3029 Plan as defined in s. 373.4592(2); and the Northern Everglades 3030 and Estuaries Protection Program as set forth in s. 373.4595. 3031 From these funds, $32 million shall be distributed each fiscal 3032 year through the 2023-2024 fiscal year to the South Florida 3033 Water Management District for the Long-Term Plan as defined in 3034 s. 373.4592(2). After deducting the $32 million distributed 3035 under this subparagraph, from the funds remaining, a minimum of 3036 the lesser of 76.5 percent or $100 million shall be appropriated 3037 each fiscal year through the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the 3038 planning, design, engineering, and construction of the 3039 Comprehensive Everglades Restoration Plan as set forth in s. 3040 373.470, including the Central Everglades Planning Project, the 3041 Everglades Agricultural Area Storage Reservoir Project, the Lake 3042 Okeechobee Watershed Project, the C-43 West Basin Storage 3043 Reservoir Project, the Indian River Lagoon-South Project, the 3044 Western Everglades Restoration Project, and the Picayune Strand 3045 Restoration Project. The Department of Environmental Protection 3046 and the South Florida Water Management District shall give 3047 preference to those Everglades restoration projects that reduce 3048 harmful discharges of water from Lake Okeechobee to the St. 3049 Lucie or Caloosahatchee estuaries in a timely manner. For the 3050 purpose of performing the calculation provided in this 3051 subparagraph, the amount of debt service paid pursuant to 3052 paragraph (a) for bonds issued after July 1, 2016, for the 3053 purposes set forth under this paragraph shall be added to the 3054 amount remaining after the payments required under paragraph 3055 (a). The amount of the distribution calculated shall then be 3056 reduced by an amount equal to the debt service paid pursuant to 3057 paragraph (a) on bonds issued after July 1, 2016, for the 3058 purposes set forth under this subparagraph. 3059 2.âA minimum of the lesser of 7.6 percent or $50 million 3060 shall be appropriated annually for spring restoration, 3061 protection, and management projects. For the purpose of 3062 performing the calculation provided in this subparagraph, the 3063 amount of debt service paid pursuant to paragraph (a) for bonds 3064 issued after July 1, 2016, for the purposes set forth under this 3065 paragraph shall be added to the amount remaining after the 3066 payments required under paragraph (a). The amount of the 3067 distribution calculated shall then be reduced by an amount equal 3068 to the debt service paid pursuant to paragraph (a) on bonds 3069 issued after July 1, 2016, for the purposes set forth under this 3070 subparagraph. 3071 3.âThe sum of $5 million shall be appropriated annually 3072 each fiscal year through the 2025-2026 fiscal year to the St. 3073 Johns River Water Management District for projects dedicated to 3074 the restoration of Lake Apopka. This distribution shall be 3075 reduced by an amount equal to the debt service paid pursuant to 3076 paragraph (a) on bonds issued after July 1, 2016, for the 3077 purposes set forth in this subparagraph. 3078 4.âThe sum of $64 million is appropriated and shall be 3079 transferred to the Everglades Trust Fund for the 2018-2019 3080 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter, for the EAA 3081 reservoir project pursuant to s. 373.4598. Any funds remaining 3082 in any fiscal year shall be made available only for Phase II of 3083 the C-51 reservoir project or projects identified in 3084 subparagraph 1. and must be used in accordance with laws 3085 relating to such projects. Any funds made available for such 3086 purposes in a fiscal year are in addition to the amount 3087 appropriated under subparagraph 1. This distribution shall be 3088 reduced by an amount equal to the debt service paid pursuant to 3089 paragraph (a) on bonds issued after July 1, 2017, for the 3090 purposes set forth in this subparagraph. 3091 5.âThe sum of $50 million shall be appropriated annually to 3092 the South Florida Water Management District for the Lake 3093 Okeechobee Watershed Restoration Project in accordance with s. 3094 373.4599. This distribution must be reduced by an amount equal 3095 to the debt service paid pursuant to paragraph (a) on bonds 3096 issued after July 1, 2021, for the purposes set forth in this 3097 subparagraph. 3098 6.âThe sum of $100 million shall be appropriated annually 3099 to the Department of Environmental Protection for the 3100 acquisition of land pursuant to s. 259.105. 3101 7.âNotwithstanding subparagraph 6. subparagraphs 3. and 6., 3102 for the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, funds shall be 3103 appropriated as provided in the General Appropriations Act. This 3104 subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026. 3105 Section 86.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3106 1650 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 3107 notwithstanding chapter 255, Florida Statutes, the Department of 3108 Agriculture and Consumer Services may lease an existing facility 3109 that meets the requirements of s. 581.1843(6), Florida Statutes, 3110 and may administer a program to expedite the expansion of the 3111 propagation of Citrus sinensis or Citrus sinensis-like budwood 3112 trees and seedlings that show tolerance or resistance to citrus 3113 greening, and to commercialize technologies that produce 3114 tolerance or resistance to citrus greening in trees. This 3115 section expires July 1, 2027. 3116 Section 87.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3117 1660 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 3118 notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the 3119 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services may submit 3120 budget amendments, subject to the notice, review, and objection 3121 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to increase budget 3122 authority to support the National School Lunch Program. This 3123 section expires July 1, 2027. 3124 Section 88.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 3125 2331 through 2338 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 3126 subsection (3) of section 288.80125, Florida Statutes, is 3127 amended to read: 3128 288.80125âTriumph Gulf Coast Trust Fund.â 3129 (3)âFor the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, funds shall be 3130 used for the Rebuild Florida Revolving Loan Fund program to 3131 provide assistance to businesses impacted by Hurricane Michael 3132 as provided in the General Appropriations Act. This subsection 3133 expires July 1, 2027 2026. 3134 Section 89.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 3135 2055 through 2068, 2069D through 2069E, 2080 through 2090, 2092 3136 through 2100, and 2138 through 2151 of the 2026-2027 General 3137 Appropriations Act, paragraph (h) of subsection (7) of section 3138 339.135, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3139 339.135âWork program; legislative budget request; 3140 definitions; preparation, adoption, execution, and amendment.â 3141 (7)âAMENDMENT OF THE ADOPTED WORK PROGRAM.â 3142 (h)1.âAny work program amendment that also adds a new 3143 project, or phase thereof, to the adopted work program in excess 3144 of $3 million is subject to approval by the Legislative Budget 3145 Commission. Any work program amendment submitted under this 3146 paragraph must include, as supplemental information, a list of 3147 projects, or phases thereof, in the current 5-year adopted work 3148 program which are eligible for the funds within the 3149 appropriation category being used for the proposed amendment. 3150 The department shall provide a narrative with the rationale for 3151 not advancing an existing project, or phase thereof, in lieu of 3152 the proposed amendment. 3153 2.âIf the department submits an amendment to the 3154 Legislative Budget Commission and the commission does not meet 3155 or consider the amendment within 30 days after its submittal, 3156 the chair and vice chair of the commission may authorize the 3157 amendment to be approved pursuant to s. 216.177. This 3158 subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026. 3159 Section 90.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 3160 2055 through 2068, 2069D, 2069E, 2080 through 2082, 2092 through 3161 2100 and 2138 through 2151 of the 2026-2027 General 3162 Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding s. 339.135(7)(b), 3163 Florida Statutes, the Department of Transportation is authorized 3164 to request up to $100 million of budget authority to the extent 3165 necessary to advance or defer projects programmed in the Work 3166 Program and realign resources to safeguard district allocations 3167 and ensure projects programmed in the Work Program are balanced 3168 to the finance plan. The department may submit budget amendments 3169 to realign budget authority consistent with this section and 3170 pursuant to s. 339.135(7), Florida Statutes. This section 3171 expires July 1, 2027. 3172 Section 91.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3173 2396 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (6) 3174 of section 288.0655, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3175 288.0655âRural Infrastructure Fund.â 3176 (6)âFor the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, the funds 3177 appropriated for the grant program for Florida Panhandle 3178 counties shall be distributed pursuant to and for the purposes 3179 described in the proviso language associated with Specific 3180 Appropriation 2396 2113 of the 2026-2027 2025-2026 General 3181 Appropriations Act. This subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026. 3182 Section 92.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 3183 2396A through 2396J of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 3184 section 288.013, Florida Statutes, is created to read: 3185 288.013âOffice of Rural Prosperity.â 3186 (1)âThe Legislature finds that the unique characteristics 3187 of the rural communities in this state are integral to making 3188 Florida an attractive place to visit, work, and live. The 3189 Legislature further finds that fostering a prosperous rural 3190 economy and vibrant rural communities serves the best interests 3191 of this state. Rural prosperity supports this stateâs 3192 infrastructure, housing, agricultural, and food-processing needs 3193 and advances the overall health of Floridaâs economy. It is 3194 essential that rural areas be able to grow and thrive, whether 3195 independently or through regional partnerships. To better serve 3196 rural communities, and in recognition of the unique challenges 3197 and opportunities they face, the Office of Rural Prosperity is 3198 established to ensure that state efforts to support rural 3199 Florida are coordinated, focused, and effective. 3200 (2)âNotwithstanding s. 20.60, the Office of Rural 3201 Prosperity is created within the Department of Commerce to 3202 support rural communities by helping rural stakeholders navigate 3203 available programs and resources and by representing rural 3204 interests across state government. 3205 (3)âThe Governor shall appoint a director to lead the 3206 office, subject to confirmation by the Senate. The director 3207 shall report to the secretary of the department and shall serve 3208 at the pleasure of the secretary. 3209 (4)âThe office shall do all of the following: 3210 (a)âServe as the stateâs point of contact for rural local 3211 governments. 3212 (b)âProvide administrative support to the Rural Economic 3213 Development Initiative (REDI) pursuant to s. 288.0656. 3214 (c)âProvide training and technical assistance to rural 3215 local governments on a broad range of community and economic 3216 development activities. The training and technical assistance 3217 may be offered using communications technology or in person. In 3218 addition, the office shall post a recorded training and 3219 technical assistance video to the officeâs website which covers 3220 all of the required topics. The training and technical 3221 assistance must include, at a minimum, the following topics: 3222 1.âHow to access state and federal resources, including 3223 training on the online rural resource directory required under 3224 paragraph (d). 3225 2.âBest practices for comprehensive planning, economic 3226 development, and land development in rural communities. 3227 3.âStrategies to address staffing shortages and strengthen 3228 management functions in rural local governments. 3229 4.âRequirements of, and updates on recent changes to, the 3230 Community Planning Act under s. 163.3161. 3231 5.âUpdates on other recent state and federal laws affecting 3232 rural local governments. 3233 (d)âCreate and maintain an online rural resource directory 3234 to serve as an interactive tool for users to navigate state and 3235 federal resources, tools, and services available to rural local 3236 governments. The office shall ensure the directory is regularly 3237 updated and, to the greatest extent possible, includes current 3238 information on programs, resources, and services that address 3239 the needs of rural communities in all areas of governance. Each 3240 state agency shall routinely provide information and updates to 3241 the office to support maintenance of the directory. The 3242 directory must allow users to search by indicators, such as 3243 agency name, resource type, or topic, and include a notification 3244 feature that alerts users when new or updated resources are 3245 available. To the greatest extent possible, the directory must 3246 identify any financial match requirements associated with listed 3247 programs. 3248 (5)(a)âBy October 1, 2026, the office shall establish and 3249 provide staff for seven regional rural community liaison centers 3250 across this state to provide specialized in-person state support 3251 to rural local governments located in rural areas of opportunity 3252 as defined in s. 288.0656. The department shall, by rule, divide 3253 the state into seven regions and assign a liaison center to each 3254 region. Each liaison center shall serve the local governments 3255 within its geographic area and shall be staffed with at least 3256 two full-time department employees. At a minimum, each liaison 3257 center has the following powers and duties: 3258 1.âAssist local governments in planning and achieving goals 3259 related to local or regional growth, economic development, and 3260 rural prosperity. 3261 2.âFacilitate access to state and federal resources, 3262 including grants, loans, and other available assistance. 3263 3.âAdvise local governments on available program waivers, 3264 including financial match waivers or reductions for projects 3265 using state or federal funds through REDI under s. 288.0656. 3266 4.âCoordinate technical assistance needs with the 3267 department and other state or federal agencies. 3268 5.âPromote model ordinances, policies, and strategies 3269 related to economic development. 3270 6.âAssist local governments with regulatory and reporting 3271 compliance requirements. 3272 (b)âTo the greatest extent possible, each regional rural 3273 community liaison center shall coordinate with local and 3274 regional governmental entities, regional economic development 3275 organizations as defined in s. 288.018, and other appropriate 3276 entities to establish a network that fosters community-driven 3277 solutions promoting viable and sustainable rural communities. 3278 (c)âEach regional rural community liaison center shall 3279 regularly engage with REDI established in s. 288.0656, and at 3280 least one staff member from each liaison center shall attend the 3281 monthly REDI meeting, either in person or by means of electronic 3282 communication. 3283 (6)âBy December 1, 2026, the director of the office shall 3284 submit to the Administration Commission within the Executive 3285 Office of the Governor a written report describing the officeâs 3286 operations and accomplishments for the preceding year. In 3287 consultation with the Department of Agriculture and Consumer 3288 Services, the office shall also include in the report 3289 recommendations for policies, programs, and funding initiatives 3290 to further support the needs of rural communities in this state. 3291 The office shall also submit the report to the President of the 3292 Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives by 3293 December 1 of each year and publish it on the officeâs website. 3294 At the next scheduled meeting of the Administration Commission 3295 following submission of the report, the director shall, in 3296 person, present detailed information from the report required 3297 under this subsection. 3298 (7)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 3299 Section 93.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3300 2396E of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, paragraph (f) 3301 is added to subsection (7) of section 288.001, Florida Statutes, 3302 to read: 3303 288.001âThe Florida Small Business Development Center 3304 Network.â 3305 (7)âADDITIONAL STATE FUNDS; USES; PAY-PER-PERFORMANCE 3306 INCENTIVES; STATEWIDE SERVICE; SERVICE ENHANCEMENTS; BEST 3307 PRACTICES; ELIGIBILITY.â 3308 (f)âNotwithstanding paragraphs (a), (b), and (c), the 3309 network shall use funds directly appropriated for the specific 3310 purpose of expanding service in rural communities as defined in 3311 s. 288.0656, in addition to any funds allocated by the network 3312 from other sources. The network shall use the funds to develop 3313 an activity plan focused on network consultants and resources in 3314 rural communities. In collaboration with regional economic 3315 development organizations as defined in s. 288.018, the plan 3316 must provide for either full- or part-time consultants to be 3317 available for at least 20 hours per week in rural areas or to be 3318 permanently stationed in rural areas. This may include 3319 establishing a circuit in specific rural locations to ensure the 3320 consultantsâ availability on a regular basis. By using the funds 3321 to create a regular presence in rural areas, the network will 3322 strengthen community collaboration, raise awareness of available 3323 resources to provide opportunities for new business development 3324 or existing business growth, and make professional experience, 3325 education, and business information available in these essential 3326 communities. The network may dedicate funds to facilitate local 3327 or regional events that focus on small business topics, provide 3328 consulting services, and leverage partner organizations, such as 3329 the regional economic development organizations, local workforce 3330 development boards as described in s. 445.007, and Florida 3331 College System institutions. This paragraph expires July 1, 3332 2027. 3333 Section 94.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3334 2396F of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, section 3335 288.014, Florida Statutes, is created to read: 3336 288.014âRenaissance Grants Program.â 3337 (1)âThe Legislature finds that it has historically provided 3338 programs to assist rural communities with economic development 3339 and to enhance their ability to attract businesses and that, by 3340 providing that extra component of economic viability, rural 3341 communities are able to attract new businesses and grow existing 3342 ones. However, the Legislature further finds that a subset of 3343 rural communities has decreased in population over the past 3344 decade, contributing to a decline in local business activity and 3345 economic development. The Legislature therefore determines that 3346 state assistance must evolve to support these communities in 3347 achieving the foundation necessary for economic viability. The 3348 intent of the Renaissance Grants Program is to reverse economic 3349 deterioration in such rural communities by retaining and 3350 attracting residents by giving them a reason to stay, which will 3351 stimulate natural economic growth, business opportunities, and 3352 improved quality of life. 3353 (2)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity within the department 3354 shall administer the Renaissance Grants Program to provide block 3355 grants to eligible counties. By August 1, 2026, the Office of 3356 Economic and Demographic Research shall certify to the Office of 3357 Rural Prosperity which counties are growth-impeded. For the 3358 purposes of this section, the term âgrowth-impededâ means a 3359 county that, as of the most recent population estimate, has 3360 experienced a declining population over the previous 10 years. 3361 After the initial certification, the Office of Economic and 3362 Demographic Research shall annually certify whether the county 3363 remains growth-impeded, until the office certifies the county 3364 has had 3 consecutive years of population growth. Upon such 3365 certification of population growth, the county remains eligible 3366 for the program for 1 additional year to prepare for the end of 3367 block grant funding. 3368 (3)(a)âEach participating county shall enter into an 3369 agreement with the Office of Rural Prosperity to receive block 3370 grant funds. Counties have broad authority to design their 3371 specific plan to achieve population growth consistent with this 3372 section. The Office of Rural Prosperity may not determine the 3373 manner in which a county implements its plan. However, regional 3374 rural community liaison center staff shall provide assistance in 3375 developing the countyâs plan, upon the countyâs request. 3376 (b)âEach participating county shall submit a report to the 3377 Office of Rural Prosperity detailing program activities, 3378 intergovernmental agreements, and other information as required 3379 by the office. 3380 (c)âEach participating county shall receive $1 million from 3381 the funds appropriated to the program, or an equal share of the 3382 funds appropriated if insufficient to provide that amount. 3383 Counties shall make all attempts to limit expenses for 3384 administrative costs, consistent with the need for prudent 3385 management and accountability in the use of public funds. 3386 Counties may supplement the block grant with other funding 3387 sources, including local, state, or federal grants, and may seek 3388 public or private contributions or in-kind support to advance 3389 program activities. 3390 (4)(a)âEach participating county shall hire and retain a 3391 renaissance coordinator, who may be funded from block grant 3392 proceeds. The renaissance coordinator is responsible for: 3393 1.âEnsuring that block grant funds are used as provided in 3394 this section; 3395 2.âCoordinating with other local governments, school 3396 boards, Florida College System institutions, and other partners; 3397 and 3398 3.âReporting as necessary to the state, including 3399 information necessary pursuant to subsection (7). 3400 (b)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity regional rural community 3401 liaison center staff shall, upon request, provide assistance and 3402 training to the renaissance coordinator to support successful 3403 implementation of the block grant. 3404 (5)âEach participating county shall design a plan for 3405 targeted community investments designed to achieve population 3406 growth and increase economic vitality. The plan must include the 3407 following key features for use of the state support: 3408 (a)âTechnology centers located within schools or on school 3409 premises, administered by the local school board, providing 3410 extended hours and access for students. 3411 (b)âFacilities that colocate adult day care with child care 3412 facilities. The site-sharing facilities must be managed to also 3413 encourage interaction between generations and increase the 3414 health and well-being of younger and older participants, reduce 3415 social isolation, and create cost and time efficiencies for 3416 working families. The regional rural community liaison center 3417 staff of the Office of Rural Prosperity shall, upon request, 3418 assist the county with bringing recommendations to the Rural 3419 Economic Development Initiative or the appropriate state agency 3420 to streamline all required state permits, licenses, regulations, 3421 or other requirements. 3422 (c)âTechnology labs operated in partnership with the 3423 nearest Florida College System institution or a career center 3424 under s. 1001.44. Repurposed vacant industrial sites or existing 3425 office space must be given priority in the selection of lab 3426 locations. Each local technology lab must be staffed and open 3427 for extended hours with the capacity to provide: 3428 1.âAccess to trainers and equipment necessary for earning 3429 certificates or online degrees in technology; 3430 2.âHands-on assistance in securing remote work 3431 opportunities; and 3432 3.âStudio space equipped for remote technology-based work 3433 available for graduates and other qualifying residents. 3434 Participating counties may determine which residents receive 3435 priority access. Collaboration with community partners, 3436 including the local workforce development board as described in 3437 s. 445.007, to provide training opportunities, in-kind support 3438 such as transportation to and from the lab, financing of 3439 equipment for in-home use, or basic maintenance of such 3440 equipment is required. 3441 (6)âIn addition to hiring a renaissance coordinator, each 3442 participating county shall develop intergovernmental agreements 3443 for shared responsibilities with its municipalities, school 3444 board, and Florida College System institution or career center 3445 and enter into necessary contracts with providers and community 3446 partners in order to implement the plan. 3447 (7)(a)âBeginning in 2027, the Auditor General shall conduct 3448 an operational audit as defined in s. 11.45 of each countyâs 3449 grant activities. 3450 (b)âBy July 1, 2027, the Office of Economic and Demographic 3451 Research shall submit a report to the President of the Senate 3452 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives summarizing 3453 renaissance block grant recipients by county. The report must 3454 provide key economic indicators that measure progress in 3455 reversing long-term trends in the county. The Office of Rural 3456 Prosperity shall, upon request, provide any data necessary to 3457 complete the report. 3458 (8)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301, funds appropriated for the 3459 purposes of this section are not subject to reversion. 3460 (9)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 3461 Section 95.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3462 2396G of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, section 3463 288.0175, Florida Statutes, is created to read: 3464 288.0175âPublic Infrastructure Smart Technology Grant 3465 Program.â 3466 (1)âThe Public Infrastructure Smart Technology Grant 3467 Program is established within the Office of Rural Prosperity 3468 within the department to fund and support public infrastructure 3469 smart technology projects in communities located in rural areas 3470 of opportunity, subject to legislative appropriation. 3471 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 3472 (a)ââPublic infrastructure smart technologyâ means systems 3473 or applications that use connectivity, data analytics, or 3474 automation to improve public infrastructure by increasing 3475 efficiency, enhancing public services, and promoting sustainable 3476 development. 3477 (b)ââRural area of opportunityâ has the same meaning as in 3478 s. 288.0656. 3479 (c)ââSmart regionâ means a geographic area that uses 3480 technology and innovative ideas to improve the quality of life 3481 for its citizens by addressing regional challenges through 3482 collaboration among government, businesses, and communities. 3483 (d)ââSmart technology lead organizationâ means a not-for 3484 profit corporation organized under s. 501(c)(3) of the Internal 3485 Revenue Code which has been in existence for at least 3 years 3486 and specializes in smart region planning. 3487 (3)(a)âBy October 1, 2026, the Office of Rural Prosperity 3488 shall contract with one or more smart technology lead 3489 organizations to administer the grant program for the purpose of 3490 deploying public infrastructure smart technology in rural 3491 communities. Under such contracts, the smart technology lead 3492 organization shall award grants to counties and municipalities 3493 located within a rural area of opportunity for eligible public 3494 infrastructure smart technology projects. 3495 (b)âEach contract must specify deliverables, reporting 3496 requirements, timeframes, and any other term the office deems 3497 necessary. At a minimum, the contract must require the smart 3498 technology lead organization to: 3499 1.âCollaborate with counties and municipalities in rural 3500 areas of opportunity to identify cost-effective smart technology 3501 solutions for improving public services and infrastructure. 3502 2.âProvide technical assistance to counties and 3503 municipalities located in rural areas of opportunity in 3504 developing public infrastructure smart technology project plans. 3505 3.âFacilitate connections between rural communities and 3506 other entities, including companies and regional partners to 3507 maximize the impact of funded projects. 3508 (4)âThe Office of Rural Prosperity shall include a summary 3509 of projects funded under this section in its report required by 3510 s. 288.013(6). 3511 (5)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 3512 Section 96.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3513 2396J of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, section 3514 288.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3515 288.065âRural Community Development Revolving Loan Fund.â 3516 (1)âThe Rural Community Development Revolving Loan Fund 3517 Program is established within the Office of Rural Prosperity 3518 department to facilitate the use of existing federal, state, and 3519 local financial resources by providing local governments with 3520 financial assistance to further promote the economic viability 3521 of rural communities. These funds may be used to finance 3522 initiatives directed toward maintaining or developing the 3523 economic base of rural communities, especially initiatives 3524 addressing employment opportunities for residents of these 3525 communities. 3526 (2)(a)âThe program shall provide for long-term loans, loan 3527 guarantees, and loan loss reserves to units of local 3528 governments, or economic development organizations substantially 3529 underwritten by a unit of local government., 3530 (b)âFor purposes of this section, the term âunit of local 3531 governmentâ means any of the following: 3532 1.âA county within counties with a population populations 3533 of 75,000 or less. fewer, or within any 3534 2.âA county with a population of 125,000 or less fewer 3535 which is contiguous to a county with a population of 75,000 or 3536 less. fewer 3537 3.âA municipality within a county described in subparagraph 3538 1. or subparagraph 2. 3539 4.âA county or municipality within a rural area of 3540 opportunity designated under s. 288.0656. 3541 3542 For purposes of this paragraph, population is determined in 3543 accordance with the most recent official estimates pursuant to 3544 s. 186.901 and must include those residing in incorporated and 3545 unincorporated areas of a county, based on the most recent 3546 official population estimate as determined under s. 186.901, 3547 including those residing in incorporated areas and those 3548 residing in unincorporated areas of the county, or to units of 3549 local government, or economic development organizations 3550 substantially underwritten by a unit of local government, within 3551 a rural area of opportunity. 3552 (c)(b)âRequests for loans must shall be made by application 3553 to the office department. Loans must shall be made pursuant to 3554 agreements specifying the terms and conditions agreed to between 3555 the applicant and the office department. The loans are shall be 3556 the legal obligations of the applicant. 3557 (d)(c)âAll repayments of principal and interest must shall 3558 be returned to the loan fund and made available for loans to 3559 other applicants. However, in a rural area of opportunity 3560 designated under s. 288.0656 by the Governor, and upon approval 3561 by the office department, repayments of principal and interest 3562 may be retained by the applicant if such repayments are 3563 dedicated and matched to fund regionally based economic 3564 development organizations representing the rural area of 3565 opportunity. 3566 (3)âThe office department shall manage the fund, 3567 establishing loan practices that must include, but are not 3568 limited to, procedures for establishing loan interest rates, 3569 uses of funding, application procedures, and application review 3570 procedures. The office has department shall have final approval 3571 authority for any loan under this section. 3572 (4)âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 216.301, funds 3573 appropriated for this loan fund may purpose shall not be subject 3574 to reversion. 3575 (5)âThe office shall include in its report required under 3576 s. 288.013 detailed information about the fund, including loans 3577 made during the previous fiscal year, loans active, loans 3578 terminated or repaid, and the amount of funds not obligated as 3579 of 14 days before the date the report is due. 3580 Section 97.âThe amendments to s. 288.065, Florida Statutes, 3581 made by this act expire July 1, 2027, and the text of that 3582 section shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2026, 3583 except that any amendments to such text enacted other than by 3584 this act shall be preserved and continue to operate to the 3585 extent that such amendments are not dependent upon the portions 3586 of text which expire pursuant to this section. 3587 Section 98.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 3588 2759 through 2764 and sections 154 and 155 of the 2026-2027 3589 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding ss. 216.181 and 3590 216.292, Florida Statutes, the Division of Emergency Management 3591 may submit budget amendments, subject to the notice, review, and 3592 objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, to 3593 increase budget authority for projected expenditures due to 3594 reimbursements from federally declared disasters if additional 3595 federal revenues specific to such programs become available in 3596 the 2026-2027 fiscal year. This section expires July 1, 2027. 3597 Section 99.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3598 2750 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (2) 3599 of section 282.201, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3600 282.201âState data center.âThe state data center is 3601 established within the department. The provision of data center 3602 services must comply with applicable state and federal laws, 3603 regulations, and policies, including all applicable security, 3604 privacy, and auditing requirements. The department shall appoint 3605 a director of the state data center who has experience in 3606 leading data center facilities and has expertise in cloud 3607 computing management. 3608 (2)âUSE OF THE STATE DATA CENTER.â 3609 (a)âThe following are exempt from the use of the state data 3610 center: the Department of Law Enforcement, the Department of the 3611 Lotteryâs Gaming System, Systems Design and Development in the 3612 Office of Policy and Budget, the regional traffic management 3613 centers as described in s. 335.14(2) and the Office of Toll 3614 Operations of the Department of Transportation, the State Board 3615 of Administration, state attorneys, public defenders, criminal 3616 conflict and civil regional counsel, capital collateral regional 3617 counsel, and the Florida Housing Finance Corporation. 3618 (b)âThe Division of Emergency Management is exempt from the 3619 use of the state data center. This paragraph expires July 1, 3620 2027 2026. 3621 Section 100.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3622 2367 of the 2025-2026 General Appropriations Act, and upon the 3623 expiration and reversion of the amendments to s. 443.1113, 3624 Florida Statutes, pursuant to section 105 of chapter 2025-199, 3625 Laws of Florida, subsections (4) and (5) of section 443.1113, 3626 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3627 443.1113âReemployment Assistance Claims and Benefits 3628 Information System.â 3629 (4)(a)âThe Department of Commerce shall perform an annual 3630 review of the system and identify enhancements or modernization 3631 efforts that improve the delivery of services to claimants and 3632 employers and reporting to state and federal entities. These 3633 improvements are subject to appropriation, and must include, but 3634 need not be limited to: 3635 1.âInfrastructure upgrades through cloud services. 3636 2.âSoftware improvements. 3637 3.âEnhanced data analytics and reporting. 3638 4.âIncreased cybersecurity pursuant to s. 282.318. 3639 (b)âThe department shall seek input on recommended 3640 enhancements from, at a minimum, the following entities: 3641 1.âThe Florida Digital Service within the Department of 3642 Management Services. 3643 2.âThe General Tax Administration Program Office within the 3644 Department of Revenue. 3645 3.âThe Division of Accounting and Auditing within the 3646 Department of Financial Services. 3647 (5)âBy September 1, 2026 October 1, 2023, and each year 3648 thereafter, the Department of Commerce shall submit a 3649 Reemployment Assistance Claims and Benefits Information System 3650 report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 3651 Speaker of the House of Representatives. The report must, at a 3652 minimum, include: 3653 (a)âA summary of clearly defined deliverables and 3654 measurable outcomes of maintenance, enhancement, and 3655 modernization efforts over the last fiscal year. 3656 (b)âA plan for the next 2 fiscal years 3-year outlook of 3657 recommended enhancements or modernization efforts that includes 3658 projected nonrecurring project costs, clear deliverables, and 3659 timeframes for completion of each enhancement or modernization 3660 effort in priority order, and the projected recurring operations 3661 and maintenance costs after the completion of each enhancement 3662 or modernization effort. 3663 Section 101.âThe amendments to s. 443.1113(4) and (5), 3664 Florida Statutes, made by this act expire July 1, 2027, and the 3665 text of those subsections shall revert to that in existence on 3666 June 30, 2025, except that any amendments to such text enacted 3667 other than by this act shall be preserved and continue to 3668 operate to the extent that such amendments are not dependent 3669 upon the portions of text which expire pursuant to this section. 3670 Section 102.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriation 3671 2359 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, subsection (9) 3672 of section 445.08, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsections 3673 (2) and (4) of that section are reenacted, to read: 3674 445.08âFlorida Law Enforcement Recruitment Bonus Payment 3675 Program.â 3676 (2)(a)âThere is created within the department the Florida 3677 Law Enforcement Recruitment Bonus Payment Program to aid in the 3678 recruitment of law enforcement officers within the state. The 3679 purpose of the program is to administer one-time bonus payments 3680 of up to $5,000 to each newly employed officer within the state. 3681 (b)âBonus payments provided to eligible newly employed 3682 officers are contingent upon legislative appropriations and 3683 shall be prorated subject to the amount appropriated for the 3684 program. 3685 (4)âThe department shall develop an annual plan for the 3686 administration of the program and distribution of bonus 3687 payments. Applicable employing agencies shall assist the 3688 department with the collection of any data necessary to 3689 determine bonus payment amounts and to distribute the bonus 3690 payments, and shall otherwise provide the department with any 3691 information or assistance needed to fulfill the requirements of 3692 this section. At a minimum, the plan must include: 3693 (a)âThe method for determining the estimated number of 3694 newly employed officers to gain or be appointed to full-time 3695 employment during the applicable fiscal year. 3696 (b)âThe minimum eligibility requirements a newly employed 3697 officer must meet to receive and retain a bonus payment, which 3698 must include: 3699 1.âObtaining certification for employment or appointment as 3700 a law enforcement officer pursuant to s. 943.1395. 3701 2.âGaining full-time employment with a Florida criminal 3702 justice agency. 3703 3.âMaintaining full-time employment as a law enforcement 3704 officer with a Florida criminal justice agency for at least 2 3705 years from the date on which the officer obtained certification. 3706 The required 2-year employment period may be satisfied by 3707 maintaining full-time employment at one or more employing 3708 agencies, but such period must not contain any break in service 3709 longer than 180 calendar days. 3710 (c)âThe standards by which the department will determine 3711 under what circumstances a break in service is acceptable. A law 3712 enforcement officer must provide documentation to the department 3713 justifying a break in service. For purposes of this section, the 3714 term âbreak in serviceâ means a period of time during which the 3715 person is employed with a Florida criminal justice agency but is 3716 not employed as a full-time law enforcement officer or a period 3717 of time during which the person is in between employment as a 3718 full-time law enforcement officer for no longer than 15 days. 3719 The time period for any break in service does not count toward 3720 satisfying the 2-year full-time employment requirement of this 3721 section. 3722 (d)âThe method that will be used to determine the bonus 3723 payment amount to be distributed to each newly employed officer. 3724 (e)âThe method that will be used to distribute bonus 3725 payments to applicable employing agencies for distribution to 3726 eligible officers. Such method should prioritize distributing 3727 bonus payments to eligible officers in the most efficient and 3728 quickest manner possible. 3729 (f)âThe estimated cost to the department associated with 3730 developing and administering the program and distributing bonus 3731 payment funds. 3732 (g)âThe method by which an officer must reimburse the state 3733 if he or she received a bonus payment under the program, but 3734 failed to maintain continuous employment for the required 2-year 3735 period. Reimbursement shall not be required if an officer is 3736 discharged by his or her employing agency for a reason other 3737 than misconduct as designated on the affidavit of separation 3738 completed by the employing agency and maintained by the 3739 commission. 3740 3741 The department may establish other criteria deemed necessary to 3742 determine bonus payment eligibility and distribution. 3743 (9)âThis section expires July 1, 2027 2026. 3744 Section 103.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 3745 2384 through 2386 and sections 144, 145, 146, 152, and 153 of 3746 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding 3747 ss. 216.181 and 216.292, Florida Statutes, the Department of 3748 Commerce may submit budget amendments, subject to the notice, 3749 review, and objection procedures of s. 216.177, Florida 3750 Statutes, to increase budget authority to support the following 3751 federal grant programs: the Broadband Equity, Access, and 3752 Deployment Program (BEAD), Capital Projects Fund Program, 3753 Community Development Block Grant â Disaster Recovery Program 3754 (CDBG-DR), Weatherization Assistance Program (WAP), Home Energy 3755 Assistance Programs â Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program 3756 (LIHEAP), and Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund, Pub. L. 3757 No. 117-2. This section expires July 1, 2027. 3758 Section 104.â(1)âIn order to implement section 8 of the 3759 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, beginning July 1, 2026, 3760 and on the first day of each month thereafter, the Department of 3761 Management Services shall assess an administrative health 3762 insurance assessment on each state agency equal to the 3763 employerâs cost of individual employee health care coverage for 3764 each vacant position within such agency eligible for coverage 3765 through the Division of State Group Insurance. As used in this 3766 section, the term âstate agencyâ means an agency within the 3767 State Personnel System, the Department of the Lottery, the 3768 Justice Administrative Commission and all entities 3769 administratively housed in the Justice Administrative 3770 Commission, and the state courts system. 3771 (2)âEach state agency shall remit the assessed 3772 administrative health insurance assessment under subsection (1) 3773 to the State Employees Health Insurance Trust Fund, for the 3774 State Group Insurance Program, as provided in ss. 110.123 and 3775 110.1239, Florida Statutes, from currently allocated moneys for 3776 salaries and benefits within 30 days after receipt of the 3777 assessment from the Department of Management Services. Should 3778 any state agency become more than 60 days delinquent in payment 3779 of this obligation, the Department of Management Services shall 3780 certify to the Chief Financial Officer the amount due and the 3781 Chief Financial Officer shall transfer the amount due to the 3782 Department of Management Services. 3783 (3)âThe administrative health insurance assessment shall 3784 apply to all vacant positions funded with state funds whether 3785 fully or partially funded with state funds. Vacant positions 3786 partially funded with state funds shall pay a percentage of the 3787 assessment imposed in subsection (1) equal to the percentage 3788 share of state funds provided for such vacant positions. No 3789 assessment shall apply to vacant positions fully funded with 3790 federal funds. Each state agency shall provide the Department of 3791 Management Services with a complete list of position numbers 3792 that are funded, or partially funded, with federal funding, and 3793 include the percentage of federal funding for each position no 3794 later than July 31, 2026, and shall update the list on the last 3795 day of each month thereafter. For federally funded vacant 3796 positions, or partially funded vacant positions, each state 3797 agency shall immediately take steps to include the 3798 administrative health insurance assessment in its indirect cost 3799 plan for the 2027-2028 fiscal year and each fiscal year 3800 thereafter. A state agency shall notify the Department of 3801 Management Services, the Executive Office of the Governor, the 3802 chair of the Senate Committee on Appropriations, and the chair 3803 of the House of Representatives Budget Committee upon approval 3804 of the updated indirect cost plan. If the state agency is not 3805 able to obtain approval from its federal awarding agency, the 3806 state agency must notify the Department of Management Services, 3807 the Executive Office of the Governor, and the appropriation and 3808 budget chairs no later than January 15, 2027. 3809 (4)âPursuant to the notice, review, and objection 3810 procedures of s. 216.177, Florida Statutes, the Executive Office 3811 of the Governor may transfer budget authority appropriated in 3812 the Salaries and Benefits appropriation category between 3813 agencies in order to align the appropriations granted with the 3814 assessments that must be paid by each agency to the Department 3815 of Management Services for the administrative health insurance 3816 assessment. 3817 (5)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 3818 Section 105.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 3819 2852 and 2855 of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, and 3820 notwithstanding s. 11.13(1), Florida Statutes, the authorized 3821 salaries for members of the Legislature for the 2026-2027 fiscal 3822 year shall be set at the same level in effect on July 1, 2010. 3823 This section expires July 1, 2027. 3824 Section 106.âIn order to implement the transfer of funds 3825 from the General Revenue Fund from trust funds for the 2026-2027 3826 General Appropriations Act, and notwithstanding the expiration 3827 date in section 111 of chapter 2025-199, Laws of Florida, 3828 paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 215.32, Florida 3829 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 3830 215.32âState funds; segregation.â 3831 (2)âThe source and use of each of these funds shall be as 3832 follows: 3833 (b)1.âThe trust funds shall consist of moneys received by 3834 the state which under law or under trust agreement are 3835 segregated for a purpose authorized by law. The state agency or 3836 branch of state government receiving or collecting such moneys 3837 is responsible for their proper expenditure as provided by law. 3838 Upon the request of the state agency or branch of state 3839 government responsible for the administration of the trust fund, 3840 the Chief Financial Officer may establish accounts within the 3841 trust fund at a level considered necessary for proper 3842 accountability. Once an account is established, the Chief 3843 Financial Officer may authorize payment from that account only 3844 upon determining that there is sufficient cash and releases at 3845 the level of the account. 3846 2.âIn addition to other trust funds created by law, to the 3847 extent possible, each agency shall use the following trust funds 3848 as described in this subparagraph for day-to-day operations: 3849 a.âOperations or operating trust fund, for use as a 3850 depository for funds to be used for program operations funded by 3851 program revenues, with the exception of administrative 3852 activities when the operations or operating trust fund is a 3853 proprietary fund. 3854 b.âOperations and maintenance trust fund, for use as a 3855 depository for client services funded by third-party payors. 3856 c.âAdministrative trust fund, for use as a depository for 3857 funds to be used for management activities that are departmental 3858 in nature and funded by indirect cost earnings and assessments 3859 against trust funds. Proprietary funds are excluded from the 3860 requirement of using an administrative trust fund. 3861 d.âGrants and donations trust fund, for use as a depository 3862 for funds to be used for allowable grant or donor agreement 3863 activities funded by restricted contractual revenue from private 3864 and public nonfederal sources. 3865 e.âAgency working capital trust fund, for use as a 3866 depository for funds to be used pursuant to s. 216.272. 3867 f.âClearing funds trust fund, for use as a depository for 3868 funds to account for collections pending distribution to lawful 3869 recipients. 3870 g.âFederal grant trust fund, for use as a depository for 3871 funds to be used for allowable grant activities funded by 3872 restricted program revenues from federal sources. 3873 3874 To the extent possible, each agency must adjust its internal 3875 accounting to use existing trust funds consistent with the 3876 requirements of this subparagraph. If an agency does not have 3877 trust funds listed in this subparagraph and cannot make such 3878 adjustment, the agency must recommend the creation of the 3879 necessary trust funds to the Legislature no later than the next 3880 scheduled review of the agencyâs trust funds pursuant to s. 3881 215.3206. 3882 3.âAll such moneys are hereby appropriated to be expended 3883 in accordance with the law or trust agreement under which they 3884 were received, subject always to the provisions of chapter 216 3885 relating to the appropriation of funds and to the applicable 3886 laws relating to the deposit or expenditure of moneys in the 3887 State Treasury. 3888 4.a.âNotwithstanding any provision of law restricting the 3889 use of trust funds to specific purposes, unappropriated cash 3890 balances from selected trust funds may be authorized by the 3891 Legislature for transfer to the Budget Stabilization Fund and 3892 General Revenue Fund in the General Appropriations Act. 3893 b.âThis subparagraph does not apply to trust funds required 3894 by federal programs or mandates; trust funds established for 3895 bond covenants, indentures, or resolutions whose revenues are 3896 legally pledged by the state or public body to meet debt service 3897 or other financial requirements of any debt obligations of the 3898 state or any public body; the Division of Licensing Trust Fund 3899 in the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; the 3900 State Transportation Trust Fund; the trust fund containing the 3901 net annual proceeds from the Florida Education Lotteries; the 3902 Florida Retirement System Trust Fund; trust funds under the 3903 management of the State Board of Education or the Board of 3904 Governors of the State University System, where such trust funds 3905 are for auxiliary enterprises, self-insurance, and contracts, 3906 grants, and donations, as those terms are defined by general 3907 law; trust funds that serve as clearing funds or accounts for 3908 the Chief Financial Officer or state agencies; trust funds that 3909 account for assets held by the state in a trustee capacity as an 3910 agent or fiduciary for individuals, private organizations, or 3911 other governmental units; and other trust funds authorized by 3912 the State Constitution. 3913 Section 107.âThe text of s. 215.32(2)(b), Florida Statutes, 3914 as carried forward from chapter 2011-47, Laws of Florida, by 3915 this act expires July 1, 2027, and the text of that paragraph 3916 shall revert to that in existence on June 30, 2011, except that 3917 any amendments to such text enacted other than by this act shall 3918 be preserved and continue to operate to the extent that such 3919 amendments are not dependent upon the portions of text which 3920 expire pursuant to this section. 3921 Section 108.âIn order to implement appropriations in the 3922 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for state employee travel, 3923 the funds appropriated to each state agency which may be used 3924 for travel by state employees are limited during the 2026-2027 3925 fiscal year to travel for activities that are critical to each 3926 state agencyâs mission. Funds may not be used for travel by 3927 state employees to foreign countries, other states, conferences, 3928 staff training activities, or other administrative functions 3929 unless the agency head has approved, in writing, that such 3930 activities are critical to the agencyâs mission. The agency head 3931 shall consider using teleconferencing and other forms of 3932 electronic communication to meet the needs of the proposed 3933 activity before approving mission-critical travel. This section 3934 does not apply to travel for law enforcement purposes, military 3935 purposes, emergency management activities, or public health 3936 activities. This section expires July 1, 2027. 3937 Section 109.âIn order to implement appropriations in the 3938 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for state employee travel 3939 and notwithstanding s. 112.061, Florida Statutes, costs for 3940 lodging associated with a meeting, conference, or convention 3941 organized or sponsored in whole or in part by a state agency or 3942 the judicial branch may not exceed $225 per day. An employee may 3943 expend his or her own funds for any lodging expenses in excess 3944 of $225 per day. For purposes of this section, a meeting does 3945 not include travel activities for conducting an audit, 3946 examination, inspection, or investigation or travel activities 3947 related to a litigation or emergency response. This section 3948 expires July 1, 2027. 3949 Section 110.âIn order to implement the appropriations and 3950 reappropriations authorized in the 2026-2027 General 3951 Appropriations Act, paragraph (d) of subsection (11) of section 3952 216.181, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3953 216.181âApproved budgets for operations and fixed capital 3954 outlay.â 3955 (11) 3956 (d)âNotwithstanding paragraph (b) and paragraph (2)(b), and 3957 for the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year only, the Legislative 3958 Budget Commission may approve budget amendments for new fixed 3959 capital outlay projects or increase the amounts appropriated to 3960 state agencies for fixed capital outlay projects. This paragraph 3961 expires July 1, 2027 2026. 3962 3963 The provisions of this subsection are subject to the notice and 3964 objection procedures set forth in s. 216.177. 3965 Section 111.âIn order to implement the salaries and 3966 benefits, expenses, other personal services, contracted 3967 services, special categories, and operating capital outlay 3968 categories of the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, 3969 paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 216.292, Florida 3970 Statutes, is amended to read: 3971 216.292âAppropriations nontransferable; exceptions.â 3972 (2)âThe following transfers are authorized to be made by 3973 the head of each department or the Chief Justice of the Supreme 3974 Court whenever it is deemed necessary by reason of changed 3975 conditions: 3976 (a)âThe transfer of appropriations funded from identical 3977 funding sources, except appropriations for fixed capital outlay, 3978 and the transfer of amounts included within the total original 3979 approved budget and plans of releases of appropriations as 3980 furnished pursuant to ss. 216.181 and 216.192, as follows: 3981 1.âBetween categories of appropriations within a budget 3982 entity, if no category of appropriation is increased or 3983 decreased by more than 5 percent of the original approved budget 3984 or $250,000, whichever is greater, by all action taken under 3985 this subsection. 3986 2.âBetween budget entities within identical categories of 3987 appropriations, if no category of appropriation is increased or 3988 decreased by more than 5 percent of the original approved budget 3989 or $250,000, whichever is greater, by all action taken under 3990 this subsection. 3991 3.âAny agency exceeding salary rate established pursuant to 3992 s. 216.181(8) on June 30th of any fiscal year shall not be 3993 authorized to make transfers pursuant to subparagraphs 1. and 2. 3994 in the subsequent fiscal year. 3995 4.âNotice of proposed transfers under subparagraphs 1. and 3996 2. shall be provided to the Executive Office of the Governor and 3997 the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees at least 3998 3 days prior to agency implementation in order to provide an 3999 opportunity for review. The review shall be limited to ensuring 4000 that the transfer is in compliance with the requirements of this 4001 paragraph. 4002 5.âFor the 2026-2027 2025-2026 fiscal year, the review 4003 shall ensure that transfers proposed pursuant to this paragraph 4004 comply with this chapter, maximize the use of available and 4005 appropriate trust funds, and are not contrary to legislative 4006 policy and intent. This subparagraph expires July 1, 2027 2026. 4007 Section 112.âIn order to implement appropriations in the 4008 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act for the acquisitions of 4009 motor vehicles, and notwithstanding chapter 287, Florida 4010 Statutes, relating to the purchase of motor vehicles from a 4011 state term contract, state agencies may purchase vehicles from 4012 nonstate term contract vendors without prior approval from the 4013 Department of Management Services, provided the cost of the 4014 motor vehicle is equal to or less than the cost of a similar 4015 class of vehicle found on a state term contract and provided the 4016 funds for the purchase have been specifically appropriated. This 4017 section expires July 1, 2027. 4018 Section 113.âIn order to implement appropriations for state 4019 agencies in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act, section 4020 11.52, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4021 11.52âImplementation of enacted legislation.âEach state 4022 agency shall provide the Legislature and the Executive Office of 4023 the Governor with information about the status of implementation 4024 of recently enacted legislation. The implementation status must 4025 be provided 90 days following the effective date of the 4026 legislation and updated each August 1 thereafter until all 4027 provisions of the legislation have been fully implemented. The 4028 implementation status report must include, at a minimum, for 4029 each enacted legislation, the actions or steps taken to 4030 implement the legislation and planned actions or steps for 4031 implementation, such as any rules proposed for implementation, 4032 any procurements required, any contract executed to assist the 4033 agency in the implementation, any contracts executed to 4034 implement or administer the legislation, programs started, 4035 offices established, or other organization administrative 4036 changes made including personnel changes, or federal waivers 4037 requested; any expenditures made directly related to the 4038 implementation; and any impediments or delays in implementation, 4039 including, but not limited to, challenges of administrative 4040 rules. No later than 14 days prior to the next regular 4041 legislative session, the state agency shall provide an update of 4042 any changes to the implementation status, notify the Legislature 4043 of any protests of rulemaking or other communications regarding 4044 the implementation of the legislation and the status of any 4045 litigation related to the legislation, and identify any policy 4046 issues that need to be resolved by the Legislature to ensure 4047 timely and effective implementation of the legislation. This 4048 section expires July 1, 2027 2026. 4049 Section 114.âIn order to implement appropriations for state 4050 agencies and the judicial branch in the 2026-2027 General 4051 Appropriations Act, subsection (7) of section 216.013, Florida 4052 Statutes, is amended to read: 4053 216.013âLong-range program plan.âState agencies and the 4054 judicial branch shall develop long-range program plans to 4055 achieve state goals using an interagency planning process that 4056 includes the development of integrated agency program service 4057 outcomes. The plans shall be policy based, priority driven, 4058 accountable, and developed through careful examination and 4059 justification of all agency and judicial branch programs. 4060 (7)âNotwithstanding the provisions of this section, each 4061 state executive agency and the judicial branch are not required 4062 to develop or post a long-range program plan by September 30, 4063 2026 2025, for the 2027-2028 2026-2027 fiscal year, except in 4064 circumstances outlined in any updated written instructions 4065 prepared by the Executive Office of the Governor in consultation 4066 with the chairs of the legislative appropriations committees. 4067 This subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026. 4068 Section 115.âIn order to implement appropriations for state 4069 agencies and the judicial branch in the 2026-2027 General 4070 Appropriations Act, subsection (7) of section 216.023, Florida 4071 Statutes, is amended to read: 4072 216.023âLegislative budget requests to be furnished to 4073 Legislature by agencies.â 4074 (7)âAs part of the legislative budget request, each state 4075 agency and the judicial branch shall include an inventory of all 4076 ongoing technology-related projects that have a cumulative 4077 estimated or realized cost of more than $1 million. The 4078 inventory must, at a minimum, contain all of the following 4079 information: 4080 (a)âThe name of the technology system. 4081 (b)âA brief description of the purpose and function of the 4082 system. 4083 (c)âA brief description of the goals of the project. 4084 (d)âThe initiation date of the project. 4085 (e)âThe key performance indicators for the project. 4086 (f)âAny other metrics for the project evaluating the health 4087 and status of the project. 4088 (g)âThe original and current baseline estimated end dates 4089 of the project. 4090 (h)âThe original and current estimated costs of the 4091 project. 4092 (i)âTotal funds appropriated or allocated to the project 4093 and the current realized cost for the project by fiscal year. 4094 4095 For purposes of this subsection, an ongoing technology-related 4096 project is one which has been funded or has had or is expected 4097 to have expenditures in more than one fiscal year. An ongoing 4098 technology-related project does not include the continuance of 4099 existing hardware and software maintenance agreements, the 4100 renewal of existing software licensing agreements, or the 4101 replacement of desktop units with new technology that is 4102 substantially similar to the technology being replaced. This 4103 subsection expires July 1, 2027 2026. 4104 Section 116.âIn order to implement Specific Appropriations 4105 203, 583, 642, 1455A, 2514, and 3235, and sections 72 and 94 of 4106 the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act: 4107 (1)âOf the funds appropriated for information technology 4108 projects, 75 percent shall be held in reserve. All general 4109 revenue funds not held in reserve shall be fully released. The 4110 Agency for Health Care Administration, Department of Children 4111 and Families, Department of Corrections, Department of Financial 4112 Services, Florida Gaming Control Commission, Department of 4113 Health, and Department of Revenue are authorized to submit a 4114 budget amendment to request release of funds pursuant to chapter 4115 216, Florida Statutes. The amount requested to be released in 4116 each budget amendment may not exceed the agencyâs projected 4117 quarterly expenditures, reduced by any unexpended funds from 4118 prior releases. Release is contingent upon submission of the 4119 following: 4120 (a)âAn updated and comprehensive operational work plan; 4121 (b)âA detailed monthly spend plan with expenditures broken 4122 down by deliverable which identifies all planned and actual 4123 project work and costs specified in the current project 4124 schedule; and 4125 (c)âA copy of the project status report from the most 4126 recently completed month at the time of submission which 4127 provides justification for any variance from the most recently 4128 submitted project schedule and spend plan. 4129 (2)âThe agencies receiving funds pursuant to this section 4130 must submit monthly project status reports to the Executive 4131 Office of the Governorâs Office of Policy and Budget, the chair 4132 of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House 4133 Budget Committee, and any other designated project oversight 4134 entity no later than 30 days after the close of the previous 4135 month. Each status report must include copies of any new or 4136 updated relevant task order, contract, or purchase order. The 4137 status report must also describe progress made to date for each 4138 project milestone and deliverable, planned and actual completion 4139 dates, planned and actual costs incurred, and any current 4140 project issues or risks. 4141 (3)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 4142 Section 117.âAny section of this act which implements a 4143 specific appropriation or specifically identified proviso 4144 language in the 2026-2027 General Appropriations Act is void if 4145 the specific appropriation or specifically identified proviso 4146 language is vetoed. Any section of this act which implements 4147 more than one specific appropriation or more than one portion of 4148 specifically identified proviso language in the 2026-2027 4149 General Appropriations Act is void if all the specific 4150 appropriations or portions of specifically identified proviso 4151 language are vetoed. 4152 Section 118.âIf any other act passed during the 2026 4153 Regular Session of the Legislature contains a provision that is 4154 substantively the same as a provision in this act, but that 4155 removes or is otherwise not subject to the future repeal applied 4156 to such provision by this act, the Legislature intends that the 4157 provision in the other act takes precedence and continues to 4158 operate, notwithstanding the future repeal provided by this act. 4159 Section 119.âIf any provision of this act or its 4160 application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the 4161 invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of 4162 the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision 4163 or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are 4164 severable. 4165 Section 120.âExcept as otherwise expressly provided in this 4166 act and except for this section, which shall take effect upon 4167 this act becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1, 4168 2026, or, if this act fails to become a law until after that 4169 date, it shall take effect upon becoming a law and shall operate 4170 retroactively to July 1, 2026.